## § 1. The Question of the Origin of the Name "Nature" ["Sinn"]

The question of the origin of the term "nature" ["Sinn"] is one of the most fundamental within which the question of the being of beings should look for a definite answer. On the other hand, it is not at all clear where precisely this question should lead. On the one hand, it could plainly be guided by the question whether nature shows itself in a definite way at all, and whether this being [Seiende] is in the proper ontological sense of the meaning of the word. On the other hand, we could also understand the question in an ontologically inclined way, by tracing the development of the question of being in the context of the existentiality of being. But this ontologically inclined question is then confronted by the fact that nature can be understood in a peculiar way, under the rubric of "nature," which is then readjusted to the "nature" of culture and the "natural world." The question of the kind of being of "nature" ["Sein"] is then forced to the fore by the question of the kind of being of culture.

However, if we now ask the question of the kind of being of "nature," we are forced to a more radical conception of the question of the being of beings. "Nature" is now understood more precisely in the sense of the "world" ["Welt"]. Thus the existential phenomenon of "nature" is to be discussed which first makes it ontologically possible to delimit the kind of being of the being which belongs to "nature."

The analysis of "nature" already presupposes a clarification of the ontological meaning of "nature." "Nature" is understood in the sense of the structure of helpful things. But the structure of this "nature" is not understood in terms of the kind of being of beings unlike us. The ontological interpretation of "nature" thus needs to develop a more primordial ontological concept of nature. If we take the word "nature" in an active and expressive way, nature can become the kind of being of beings unlike us. But what does being mean? This question cannot be avoided. "Nature" is a more penetrating ontological concept than either "being" or "not-being." It means being as such. So the existential concept of "nature" is to be delineated in a preliminary way.

In order to bring the phenomenon of "nature" to the kind of definiteness of the kind of being of the beings unlike us which is necessary for the clarification of the existential meaning of "nature," we must inquire into the phenomenon which we ourselves in each case are: being [Sein]. This phenomenon has been treated in the previous sections with a purely ontological interpretation. But we still lack an ontological interpretation of the kind of being which belongs to "being-in-the-world," namely, the kind of being of Dasein. The existential concept of "nature" is thus not without justification. But is not an ontological interpretation of Dasein also to be avoided at all? Or is the ontological interpretation of "nature" to be permitted in such a way that our existential concept of "nature" is obscured?

The problematic with regard to the ontological interpretation of "nature" has its basis, of course, in the structure of the problematic of the constitution of being of Dasein. But the ontological interpretation of "nature" is not the only one. Within the problematic of the constitution of being of Dasein, there is also a question about the meaning of being in general. In the context of this problematic, the question of the kind of being of nature is to be posed. At the same time, we must show how this question is not only not without foundation, but can turn out to be decisively opposed to the kind of being of the kind of being which we characterized as "nature."

But nature is "primordially" a "world." What does this "diversity" of being mean? Is it not the ontological meaning of "world"? What is the ontological meaning of "world"? Do we not, in appropriating the term "world," thereby negate the meaning of "world"? What does "primordial" mean when we designate the ontological "structure" of the "world"? Or does the ontological meaning mean the ontological multiplicity of the constitutive "linkages of being" which we characterized? Does not the ontological concept of "world" also show the ontological multiplicity of the "world"? Does not the ontological meaning of "world" reflect the ontological diversity of Dasein? Has not the ontological concept of "world" already been interpreted with regard to the phenomenon of world?

## § 2. The Etymology of the Word “Being” in Being and Time

On the other hand, it is not at all clear how the word “Being” got into use in the Greek or Latin word meaning Being, or how it was even originally used. We have no certainty about the use of the word because we do not even know where we stand with the Greek and Latin words. We also do not know that the word “Being” had a definite meaning in the first place.

One thing is certain: the word “Being” became the familiar one-and-the-same-thing that we have all known since antiquity, even though we did not know it as such. In the words and language of the Greeks, Being intimates a presence that is far removed from the isolated and cogito-priori concept of Being. Even today, in the words and grammar of the Greek and Latin languages, there is no trace of a definite and ancient meaning of the word anymore, much less a word that was even thought up. While it is true that there was a definite Greek and Latin grammar, this does not mean that this was the primary or even the dominant language.

The Greeks themselves, in contrast, used the word “Being” in a very different sense, in a very different grammar, in a very different vocabulary. The word “Being” has now lost its universal signification in the use of the word, and is understood in a very definite way in each case according to the specific domain of the Greeks. We also know that the use of the word in the sense of Being began with the Greeks themselves. But then, it was with the Greeks that the word “Being” first became universal. This universal meaning of the word is also found in the Greek word for “world.” The word world is derived from the Greek word for Being.

But this universal meaning of the word “Being” is also what is most in need of a proof. It is not that the Greeks did not know about the Being of beings, but they did not prove it either. They did not even need to prove it. They already knew about it. But they did not prove it. They did not even need to prove it. The great and the good, the strong and the powerful, the rulers and the ruled, have long been and will be remembered by us in different ways and under different names. We even know about it before the history of the Greeks. When we say that it is so, we mean it.

It was the great and the good, the strong and the powerful, the rulers and the ruled, who were all there in the field of the great and the good. What did it mean to them? When we speak of greatness, we do not mean the power or the might of the overwhelming, but the impact of the overwhelming upon the weak and the lowly, the ability and the will of the overwhelming to impose itself, to take hold, to take hold.

It was the great and the good, the strong and the powerful, the rulers and the ruled, who in the midst of great and the strong forces, withstood the overwhelming and held sway. What did it mean to them? When we speak of greatness, we do not mean the power of the powerful, but the ability of a power to move in the surrounding world and to be affecting. What did it mean to them? When we speak of power, we do not mean the might of the powerful, but the ability of the powerful to conquer and to occupy a space. What did it mean to them? When we speak of power, we do not mean the might of the powerful, but the ability of the powerful to be able to conquer and to occupy a space. When we speak of a state, we do not mean the absolute strength of the state, but the state as which it is. What did it mean to them? When we speak of a state, we do not mean the absolute strength of the state, but the state as which it is. What did it mean to them? When did they first see the Being-human in beings? When did they first become acquainted with the Greeks? When did they first foster an understanding of Being? When and how did they first first make the distinction between Being and becoming human? These are questions that cannot be avoided. We can only ask them now, in the light of what has been accomplished up to now, in order to make clear once again that in regard to these questions, which concern the Greeks in their historical development, a decisive development lies in the question of the meaning of Being.

The question of the meaning of Being has been carried into the interpretation of the fundamental question of metaphysics-the question of the essence of Being. The question of the meaning of Being has revealed a decisive realization in the question of the essence of metaphysics. 

## § 3. The Existential Structure of the Problem of Being-human [Wissenschaften] in the Context of the Doctrine of Being

The existential structure of the problem of Being-human has been sketched out in the preparatory fundamental analysis of Dasein (cf.  § 69). The preparatory basic analysis of Dasein as care was then followed up by the problem of Being-human ( § 70). The results of the preparatory fundamental analysis of Dasein ( § 71) have now been incorporated into the interpretation of the meaning of being of Dasein. The interpretation of the meaning of being in terms of the kinds of being of Dasein has provided the groundwork for a concrete determination of the existential structure of the problematic of the "human being."

## § 4. The Problem of Being-Human as the Beginning of an Existential Reconstruction of Dasein

The analysis of the meaning of Being-human was oriented toward the problematic of temporality. The ontological meaning of the temporality of Dasein was to be interpreted. But we still lacked the existential concept of temporality. Was a primordial temporal interpretation possible at all? How was the meaning of being-human to be understood if not with regard to the temporality of Dasein? The existential meaning of the "whole of being" that is accessible to the vulgar ontology of the "inner circle," for example, of the "soul," is temporality.1 The everydayness of the "inner circle" of Dasein has its ontological meaning in the vulgar sense of the everydayness of the "inner sphere" of Dasein. The ontological definition of the everydayness of the "inner sphere" is not a problem ontologically, but a problem of the meaning of being of everydayness itself. Everydayness is not a way of existing that is ontologically disclosed, but rather a way of being that we can only discover when we grasp the ontological meaning of the meaning of being of this being in general-the meaning of its constitutive being-with-one-another for the most part.

The contemporary vulgar interpretation of the "whole of being" has made the following mistake: it supposed that Dasein, which is ontologically the same as the everydayness of the they, means the same. Being-together-with the "world" does not mean the same. Everydayness is not the same as the everydayness of the they. But neither is this ontologically accidental, nor does this phenomenon originate from something other.

It was the duty of the existential analytic to show that the vulgar interpretation of being-human was necessarily and essentially flawed. In this way we demonstrated the essential necessity of the development of a primordial analytic of Dasein. The existential analytic of Dasein and the ontological interpretation of the meaning of being-human showed that the vulgar interpretation of being-human is not the only one that is inadequate, and that in fact it is the fundamental one.

But the primordial ontological interpretation of Dasein that we have carried out-the analysis that established the boundaries of its being-completes the first significant step towards an ontologically adequate interpretation of the meaning of being-human. The existential analytic of Dasein is not yet a genuine ontological step. But if we have followed the course of the question about the meaning of being-human that has been laid out-then the existential analytic of Dasein will never reach the answer to the question about the meaning of being-human, and may even be unable to find it.

Of course, the ontological concept of being-human has been somewhat obscured ontologically. The vulgar understanding of being-human has allowed itself the illusion that it understands the being of Dasein in its whole, without regard to the particular specific dimensions of its being. The they has also covered over the existential concept of being-human. But this cover over extends even to the their ownmost potentiality-of-being. Everydayness is the they-self. Its "there," and for it, is always a way of being-in-the-world. But the they is essentially the they that is applied to the world. It is the they that controls and determines the "how" in which everydayness, in its "there," is always already prefigured. Everydayness is the they. It is the they that controls the way in which the they-self is constituted as the they. The they is the they-self. It is the who. But it is also the whom. On the basis of this self-shadow, the they has always already taken over the specific possibilities of being constituted in the they. In this way everyday Dasein, which is in the mode of taking care of its ownmost potentiality-of-being, stands-alone-in-the-world.

## § 5. The Terms of an Interpretation of Dasein

(a) The Concept of Dasein that We Have Envisioned

The term "dwelling" is understood in an ontological sense. Living means existing in the constitution of being of a being. The term "dwelling" cannot be used in an ontologically negative sense. We use the word "dwelling" in an anthropological sense when we speak of the being which we ourselves are, that is, of the "dwelling" of others. The term "dwelling" is understood ontically in terms of the "dwelling" of others. But the phenomena which are ontologically most easily accessible and which are also of particular importance ontologically for the interpretation of the being of Dasein are the phenomena of being with regard to their being. Thus, the concept of "dwelling" which was initially established ontically is ontologically incomplete.

The concept of dwelling is not a property of Dasein, in the sense of its existence as a being. Dasein exists as being-in-the-world. This fact of being "in" the world has its most primordial and ontological significance in the constitution of being of the there. Dasein exists factically. The there is not a being which "is," but only a being which "is not." Thus, the being of Dasein cannot be "objectively ascertained" by measuring it up to the standard of the "objective" "objective," objectively present being. The standard of an objectively present being is not a being which is objectively present in space, nor a being which is objectively present in time, nor a being which is objectively present in space and time. The standard of an objectively present being is the being which is experienced by the being [Sein] of others in their Dasein so that they are their there. The standard of the objective presence of Dasein in the world is that of the being which is there "within" the world, that is, "at" it. The being which is there in each instance "objectively" and which has the kind of being of Dasein is the basis for the ontological concept of being "detached" ["unterschied" ["unterschied"], verdeckt sich ... vor] from the they.

The ontological interpretation of being-in-the-world which was founded upon the observation of the "world" already makes the following clear: the being [Sein] of Dasein is ontically the "there" ["there"] of the world which we have already characterized. But the being [Seiende] before which we have any ontological concern is also ontologically the "there" ["there"], but in a different sense. We shall use the expression "there" ontologically in an ontically indefinite sense. We shall use the expression "there" ontologically in an ontically definite way only if our existential interpretation of the being of Dasein has attained the concept of that being and has made the following clear: the being [Sein] of Dasein is an existential.

The question of the meaning of the meaning of being in general, which at first seemed solely to be a question of the meaning of being in general, soon became the question of the meaning of being in general. At the outset ( § 1) we showed that the existential meaning of being was both "and" the meaning of being in general. But since the question of being has been raised at all, and has even been the primary question, we cannot limit the question concerning the meaning of being in general to the question of the meaning of being in general.

We have shown that the question of being is indeed to be limited to the question of its meaning. But this does not mean that the question can be made the focus of a theoretical question only if the question already contained a definite ontological guideline. The question of being, as a question of being, is not a prior question and does not follow after the question what it answers. Rather, the question is the heretofore undetermined question of the meaning of being. The question is the ontological question of the meaning of being.

But the question of being is determined in what follows in such a way that the meaning of being is drawn from the meaning of being as such. The question is defined ontologically in such a way that we interpret the meaning of being in such a way that this definition is confirmed in understanding the being [Sein] of Dasein in general. The meaning of being is to be a possible way of being and a possible mode of its being.

The question of being is the ontological question of the meaning of being. In this question the specific existential phenomenon of the kind of being of Dasein is to become visible. 


## § 6. The Question of Being and the Interpretation of Being

The word “Being” cannot be used here in a derogatory sense, as in “It is a being.” The word “Being” signifies something quite different: that which, to begin with, is numbered as a being. The fact that in each case the word “Being” is used in a different sense, this does not indicate that the referential relation between the two is different. The word “Being” remains, after all, exactly the same in each case.

However, we can now speak with a certain coherence about the word “Being.” It is certainly correct that in denoting something as such, we are talking about a being. However, we must now show that the being that we are talking about is not simply another being among others. We must show that this being is one of a kind. We can neither ascertain this fact by showing that it is related to others, nor by showing that it is just a property of myself and others.

We can show this by showing the other hand of the relation in which we ourselves stand. We say: on the one hand, there is the mountain “in the sky”; on the other hand, there is the earth. But the earth is also called the “hill,” “river,” “bird,” “tree.” The fact that the earth is also called “the hill,” “river,” “bird,” “tree,” “man,” “wife,” “son,” “house,” “commune,” “departure,” “collapse,” “disappear,” “for oneself”; these and many other such things. The word “Being” is used as a word of power, as the word of the state, as the word of the clock, as the word of the farmer, as the word of all the inhabitants of the earth—all this in the domain of an idea, an idea that we call “Being.”

But now, we can also see that this “Being” in the sense of the idea, as the word “Being,” means not just a thing, a being, a being. It means the ground, the essence, the whole of beings. In the “is”, “Being,” Being means: Being-here. We thus say: Being-here means here, here, in this way. We also say: Being-here is always’s-here. In the phrase “here,” there is always the ground. We say: “here is,” and we do not simply mean: the ground is. We also say: here is,” and in this way we do not merely mean: the ground is always. Here we must understand that the word “ground” itself has a conditional meaning, a verbal substantive. It does not mean something objectively present, but rather, as this being is, it is always already objectively present in the sense of its ground.

But here is the thing: this “ground” itself comes from an objectively present being. It is the ground that sustains and grounds the being which we call “us” and which we thus first encounter. The ground of the “us” is not a mere thing, objectively present, present at hand. The ground of the “us” is not some mere thing which somehow stands in relation to another. The ground of the “us” is a being, objectively present, in the sense of its essence. This is the case even if this being is in fact not yet objectively present. The ground of this being, which is not objectively present, is the ground of the possibility of the ground of the fact that this being, being itself, is. This being “was” as this being-here” is also the ground of the possibility of the ground of the fact that this being can be.

The question of the ground of the possibility of the ground for the ground of the possibility of the ground of the ground of the possibility of the ground of the possibility of the ground of the possibility of existence is an ontological one. Because of this, the interpretation of the kind of being of Dasein, and in particular the kind of being of the being whose kind of being is the ground for all beings, must be clarified ontically.


## § 7. The Meaning of the Terms “Being and Thinking”

The terms “Being and “thinking” have been used to designate the same thing for a long time. They are now familiar and are merely the terms with which we have used the terms in the language of the Greeks. Nevertheless, the fact that the Greeks used these terms in their philosophy only means that they understood the essence of Being in terms of the essence of thinking. This essence has not been understood in an originally Greek way and has been conveyed to us in a way that has its origin in the “metaphysics” and “ontology” that were taught in the Greek schools up to the end of the third century B.C.E.

But now it comes into question whether the Greek notion of Being was ever a genuine one. Was it not an invention of the philosophers, an invention that by no means con-fronted the question of Being up to the end of the second century B.C.E.? Was it not an-theory and a-theory for the Greeks, and thus nothing more than a series of connected systems of axioms and rules that had their beginning in the philosophers?

Was it not in the interests of the great and the good if this question about Being should now be put in a secure, philosophical position, that is, if it should become clear that our great and the good, who are so different from each other in every way, stand in the same inner sphere?

But if the question about Being gets put in the place of the great and the good, then the great and the good begin to look like an unimportant minority within the larger camp.

The great and the good do not rule over the whole of society, do not even occupy an inner sphere. They are only now starting to look like a minority within a larger camp, especially when we consider that their ideas run counter to the overwhelming majority of the people. But even if the great and the good are still in the majority, then the question about Being will still remain remote and distant. In order then for us to pose the question, we must know Greek philosophy, and this means: we must know Being.

Being, as the great and the good, is something that we understand. We understand it, and we are already making the effort to understand it. But being is not something that we just casually happen to have at hand. It is not a present-at-hand thing. We do not just come across it "behind" us. Rather, in carrying out our researches and disposing of our existing knowledge, we are constantly encountering it in a certain way. In contrast, Being occupies a place in the ancient world. We do not just happen to stumble across it "socially." We encounter it as something of great import.

The question about Being is not simply a matter of convenience for us. In the course of our historical Dasein, we must either bring Being into our understanding or destroy it [that is, as the object of our historical questioning: see §69]8 for our understanding. On the other hand, if we merely took the opportunity to "admire" beings, it would remain impossible to see how the question about Being can be raised from the ground up under such circumstances. For what is the ground up when it is yet "inane" and "obvious" thinking that no longer understands Being; for what is "obvious" is not the being-obvious at all, but the seeming. In the seeming, beings appear and seem, and then disappear.

In the seeming, beings are not something that we merely come across; they are there in order to appear and appear. This seeming, which we in the end still can never grasp, is the ground for the seeming of Being itself. Even the seeming of Being is a "thing in itself."9 Yet we still do not understand this seeming properly. We do not understand it as something merely present "around the corner," nor as something merely occurring "in the vicinity of us." Rather, the seeming appears in the sense of appearing.

The seeming of Being appears to us in beings themselves. We do not deceive ourselves by looking for an "idea of a thing" in them, but rather we "see" them in such a way that beings themselves seem to be giving in to us.12 Merely to see, and yet to seem, is the semblance of seeming. Merely to seem. We know that seeming is all the more powerful when it "presents" something that already is. For mere seeming is a semblance, and yet it is not an empty one.1 We still "see" what appears to us in the semblance of seeming. We see the "surrounding world" through the semblance of seeming, and yet we "see" it as such.

## § 8. The Existential and Ontological Problem of the Existentiality of the "Inherent" and the "Ascent" of Dasein

Ontically, the meaning of being is a being which "is." It is we who are, and thus it is that beings are encountered in the world. The being of Dasein is existence. The ontological meaning of being, however, is the condition of the possibility of the fact that beings can be encountered in the surrounding world and in the world at all. "As" ["sich"]. Thus, it becomes self-evident that being "is" a being. This self-evident meaning of being is the condition of the possibility of the fact that beings can be encountered and determined in the surrounding world that Dasein has to take over from its "us" as its own. It is this "us" that is previously discovered by doing the "real" thing that we encounter in the surrounding world. The self-interpretation of the "us" discloses the "world" to the world. This world is always already at hand. But the actual world is not discovered by the "vanishing [van-Einander]" of the world; it is not even grasped by the phenomenally inappropriate term for the ontological meaning of these beings. How are we to get the phenomenally appropriate meaning of the word "world" with the customary ontological concept of world? By contrasting the ontological "idea" of worldliness with the phenomenal fact that the world is disclosed with regard to its "phenomenal" structure. How are we to get nearer to the ontological meaning of the expression "world" when the phenomenon of worldliness remains obscure and in such a way that the meaning of these beings remains obscure as well?

If the ontological meaning of "world" can be defined in terms of the structure of the world and its publicness, this ontological definition of "world" means that it is a phenomenon of the world and that, in being, it is the realm of beings that are in space. Thus, worldliness is an ontological kind of being [Sein] of the world, and yet it belongs to being. Worldliness is an ontological kind of being of the world. It does not relate itself ontically to beings as such. Worldliness is an ontological way of being-in-the-world. The ontological interpretation of the "world" does not start with a foundation of the phenomena of worldliness, but is guided by the ontological problematic which is prefigured by the phenomenon of worldliness, which we did not cover.

## § 9. The Problem of the Existential "Inherent" in Dasein and the Ontological Definition of the "Inherent" Worldliness of the World]

If the ontological problematic is to be made intelligible, it will have to do so by establishing the structure of the being of Dasein in terms of the constitutive phenomenon of its worldliness. This is not a task which can be undertaken by way of a preliminary interpretation of the everydayness of Dasein, and this is not a task which can be carried out in a detached way. Ontological interpretation is a way of being-in-the-world, and in this way has to do with the being of the "there" ["Sein"] that is disclosed in everydayness.

The ontological problematic is based in part on the analysis of the everydayness of Dasein and the everydayness of the there. In the prior context of this ontological characterization, we were able to make a preliminary determination of the everydayness of care. This "theory" has provided the ontological interpretation of the meaning of everydayness and, accordingly, the "foundations" of the systems of the ontology of Dasein. But, the ontological problematic remains incomplete. We do not know how the ontological problematic is to be carried out, or where it will lead us. But we do know that in the course of the ontological exposition of the ontological problem and its structures, a concrete ontological interpretation of the everydayness of Dasein is necessary.

The ontological interpretation of the everydayness of Dasein is to be carried out in the following existential analytic. But the characterization of everydayness is not the goal of this analytic. We do not wish merely to bring about a theoretical clarification of the "idea of existence" in general, but to make such a concrete ontological interpretation of everydayness possible.


## § 10. The Task of a Revaluation of the Existential Structure of the Worldliness of the World

The analysis of the phenomenon of worldliness has made it clear that the existential constitution of the world is at the basis of the constitution of the being of Dasein. Worldliness is not the phenomenon of a being whose kind of being is characterized by the phenomenon of world. Worldliness is only the kind of being of the "world" in the sense of the being of beings encountered within the world. Worldliness is rooted in the ecstatic temporality of temporality. And the temporality of the ecstasies is taken over with the thematic content of temporality. This involves the existentiality of the world. In the present context of the explication of temporality the task arises of determining the ontological meaning of the phenomenon of worldliness.

In the course of our analysis of the ontological meaning of the phenomenon of worldliness we have already made clear that the task of a revaluation of the ontological meaning of the phenomenon of the world is not easily or not easily soluble. Even the ontologically questionable interpretation of the meaning of the phenomenon of the world is not without justification. And it is not an arbitrary question. In the following considerations we shall show that the ontological interpretation of the phenomenon of worldliness is not restricted to a problem arising from the specific mode of being of Dasein itself. We also do not intend to restrict the ontological meaning of the phenomenon of worldliness to the phenomenon of the presence of hidden "worlds."

The ontological meaning of the phenomenon of worldliness is not a problem which "cannot" or "never arises." If such a characterization of the ontological meaning of worldliness is to lead to a problem which can be "proceeding," the ontological interpretation is not at all a priori impossible task. Ontically, Dasein is not in the least free.


## § 11. The Meaning of the Predicate

The expression "predicate" has a secondary meaning which belongs to the expression "beings." The word has a pre-ontological meaning which is determined by the kinds of being of the beings we encounter in the surrounding world. We use the expression "predicate" to name the fundamental kind of being of beings encountered within the world. "Beings" are classified according to the meaning of their "predicate" or, as it were, according to the meaning of their "object." In our ontological interpretation, the meaning of the word implies a fundamental kind of being of beings encountered within the world. It also implies some other fundamental kind of being which we shall not yet pursue. We shall discuss this further at some point. The "predicate" is the fundamental kind of being of Dasein. It is what "commands" Dasein to be. It "commands" Dasein to be, but we shall not yet get to the meaning of this command.

The meaning of the word "predicate" is "rule, direction, control, direction" (Thesis, § 51). This "rule" has the meaning of "behavior, intention, etc." The word "predicate" has a pre-ontological meaning which we shall leave to the interpretation of that meaning which we have given at all. We can show, in terms of the existing meaning of the word, that "predicate" has a predefined meaning which we have not yet clarified. We can also see that the meaning of this "predicate" is not completely clear. We use the expression "predicate" in an indefinite and undefined sense.

But what does this meaning mean? What "rule" can there be which "commands" Dasein "to be"? Does it follow from the meaning of the word "predicate" that Dasein can be "predicted" with regard to its potentiality-of-being? Could the meaning "to rule" be understood in such a way that it could be followed along with the meaning of "predicate"?

The meaning of the word "predicate" is "to direct, direct, determine the intention, etc." But we understand this "to direct" as "to direct" and "to determine the intention" as "to have an intention" (Dasein, in our earlier ontology, is understood as having an "unequivocal intention"). Does it follow from the meaning of this "predicate" that Dasein could be directed, that is, could be conceived in its being as having an intention?

The meaning of the word "predicate" is not completely indefinite. The meaning of "to direct" is also somewhat indefinite. The meaning of "to determine" is also somewhat indefinite. In both meanings of the word, a definite kind of behavior of Dasein is understood more or less clearly. But what does it mean that the "to direct" and the "to determine" is understood in a "general" way? What does this general meaning mean? The general meaning of the word "predicate" is the kind of being of the "behavior of" beings. But behavior, in our ontological sense, cannot be understood as an "instrumentality" which is attached to a definite object. It is not a "mere instrumentality" which nevertheless acts as a mere implement, but rather a kind of being of a being. The "mere instrumentality" is such that it is not at all general, but is rather subject to different instruments. This general meaning of the word is not absolutely definite, but it is by no means indefinite.

The meaning of "predicate" is neither "general" nor "specific," but "all the same" This general meaning of the word has no definite boundaries. It encompasses a broad domain. We can see this broader meaning in the meaning of the expression "the intent of the player in the game of chance." It means the same thing which "predicts" what will happen in the game: the result of a game played. In the context of this analysis we shall use the expression "chance" only in an indefinite sense. The "chance" element is intended to indicate that the "predicate" is not restricted to the instrumentality of chance elements, but encompasses all elements which are not determined solely by chance. The "chance" element is grounded in the fact that the "predicate" is a definite kind of being of Dasein.

The general meaning of the expression "predicate" is not a prohibition, but is an existential expression of the kind of being of Dasein. This meaning has no definable boundary. But this meaning represents the most primordial meaning of the word. We use this word because it characterizes the fundamental constitution of the being of Dasein, and because it is most intimately bound up with the phenomenon which we call intention.

## § 12. The Second Division [the Third] of the Doctrine of the Doctrine of the Being of Dasein

Our preparatory fundamental analysis of the third division of the Doctrine of the Being of Dasein was carried out without reference to the earlier, fundamental analysis of the first and second divisions. This result was so self-evident that it was only surprising that such a thoroughgoing questioning, which had the intention of "explaining" everything, failed to see the need for a concrete, a priori ontological interpretation of Dasein. The fact that, after all, the doctrine of the being of Dasein had been established, was not at all sufficient to exempt the doctrine of the being of Dasein from the kind of ontological questioning which would seek the ground of existence in the kind of being of Dasein.

It was in the nature of this phenomenon that the question of the meaning of being in general was left to others. These were the problems which were to determine the ultimate course of questioning in the following chapters: (1) What is the meaning of being in general? (2) The structure of the being of beings. (3) The possible ground of the possibility of existence.

With these questions in view, it is at least necessary to provide a preliminary ontological exposition of the phenomenon which is to determine the meaning of being in general. This phenomenon is not an object of theoretical speculation, but rather a kind of being of beings themselves. The existential and ontological interpretation of being is guided by the phenomenon of the being of beings. This phenomenon grabs the particular beings into which beings as such are continually encountered. But the particular beings are not encountered by chance. They are beings which were created, which were "given," which were found at the site of their "use," which "must" be accessible, as it were, if the question of the meaning of being is to be addressed.

We have set forth the ontological meaning of being as the being [Sein] which we ourselves are. We have also set forth the ontological meaning of the being which we call Dasein. Now, in order to show how and to what extent the latter is to be construed in terms of the meaning of being of beings encountered within the world, it is necessary to orient ourselves to beings encountered within the world.

## § 13. The Worldliness of the World

The analysis of the world has a twofold purpose: (a) to bring to view the ontological meaning of the being of Dasein as the being which we ourselves are and which we are "also" in terms of beings which we ourselves are not. (b) to bring the world into the ontological meaning of being and thus to its limitations. (c) to give a preliminary sketch of the ontological character of the world, in order to enable us to make a preliminary ontological interpretation of the world.)

The previous sections had an orientation toward the ontological question of the meaning of being in general. That is not sufficient anymore. It is already too late. The problematic has already been worked out. But even if this problem is to be discussed structurally, we must be able to make certain that the formal concept of the problematic has been attained beforehand. Insofar as beings are determined ontically, the problem of ontology is essentially not a problem of philosophy.

In the following analyses we shall restrict the question of the meaning of being to that of the being which we ourselves are, namely being. And only because it remains an open question whether the being which we ourselves in each case are is ontologically the "real" being [Riemens] can we ask whether the question of the meaning of being is not being "harassed" ontically, whether is not a ground of the "groundlessness" of the fact that someone interprets the meaning of being in general but is instead conducting an "idealistic" "experiment," which is then obviously inadequate. The investigation of the phenomenally adequate interpretation of the meaning of being has its appropriate goal. Its task is to bring the phenomenon of the meaning of being to the fore. But in this way the phenomenon is also obscured.

The phenomenally adequate interpretation of the meaning of being is not to be attained by ascribing to Dasein a meaning which it itself does not possess. Dasein can never be understood theoretically or phenomenally by ascribing to it a meaning. In the end, the concept of the meaning of being does not make any difference to the phenomenon. The essential ontological structures of the phenomenon have already been set forth in Dasein itself. The question of the meaning of being is not posed ontically, nor is it posed as an "idealistic" question. It is not even posed as one which could be answered theoretically. The question is the ontological question of the meaning of being itself.

## § 14. The Essence of the Critique of Hegel's Philosophy of Being

The question of the meaning of being in general has continuously been one of the chief themes of Hegel's philosophy. But Hegel's philosophy was clearly distinct from the earlier positions and conceptions of the spirit and of the soul. Its philosophy was rather a negation of all previous positions and conceptions of the spirit, and it was also a negation of all previous conceptions of the soul. But it was not only in the sphere of the realm of transcendental logic that Hegel borrowed and exploited the ideas of the day. His Hegelian philosophy, as it developed, was also permeated by the spirit of the Middle Ages. Thus, Hegel's concept of the spirit is not a matter of chance. The spirit of the Middle Ages is still dominant in the Middle Ages as it was in the times preceding Hegel. But now it is not just the influence of the Middle Ages that prevails. Now it is the pernicious influence of Hegel's dialectic on the sense of being of the spirit, of those who at the same time were carrying out the Middle Ages in their spirit and grasping at the spirit. Now it is the pernicious influence of a perverted "representation of beings" (the representative spirit) that has long ruled the understanding of being in the sense of the representative spirit of the spiritless, of the followers of the spiritless dialectic.

In order to show the manifold influence of Hegel's scholasticism in the conception of the spirit, and thus also in the understanding of the essence of Being itself, we shall again take up the question that was discussed in the course of our earlier discussion: to what extent has Hegel's interpretation of the spirit gained predominance in the interpretation of the essence of Being? In this lecture course we must show that Hegel's interpretation of the spirit up to now was not the beginning of a genuine Hegelian interpretation of the spirit, but rather the opposite. Hegel's interpretation of the spirit can be characterized as a deviation, a deviation that has since become the rule. Its factical occurrence was bound to that which was discussed up to now. It was a deviation that in its turn was bound to a more adequate, a more fundamental interpretation of the spirit as the basic attunement of Dasein.

We must show that Hegel's interpretation of the spirit up to now was not the beginning of a genuine Hegelian interpretation of the spirit. Nor was it the last, nor the beginning. We must show that Hegel's interpretation of the spirit is in fact not the beginning at all. We must show that Hegel's interpretation of the spirit was not a mistake, but was the beginning of a new phase, a phase that we call the purification of the spirit.

In the course of our discussion up to now we have seen that Hegel's interpretation of the spirit has its roots in a more original interpretation of Dasein. Indeed, we have taken our point of departure from the interpretation of the "idea of existence" up to now, but have also interpreted this interpretation in a more radical way. But it was a mistake to see this interpretation up to now as the beginning of a further interpretation. Before all the interpretations up to now, we had not even considered the question of the meaning of existence, much less understood this question. The question of the meaning of existence was left completely in the interpretation of the spirit, which at the very beginning of its interpretation made the mistake of regarding this interpretation as the first and "essential" one.

The interpretation of the spirit up to now is only the first of a series of fundamental tasks in the light of which we must now strip the interpretation of the spirit of its vacuity and ascendancy. The spirit cannot be understood as the ontic "something," "being" ["Sein"]. The spirit is existentiell, and this is not an accidental property that can be possessed by "something" and beget a being in such a way that it is, after all, the being [Sein]. The existence of the spirit is determined by the Being of the beings [Seiende] that are "in themselves" pure and existent, that is, not subject to mutation and transformation. The Being of the "in themselves" is what first makes it possible for them to be changed into a "pure" existence and thus be able to die. The determination of the spirit is the existential and ontological condition of the possibility that the "in themselves" can be "conditionally" determined.

Thus, it is not a matter of chance that on the occasion of this lecture course a memorial concert is being held in the Concert Hall of the Hegel University. The title of the concert is "The Philosophy of Hegel" and announces the purpose of the performance. This announcement, in which the concert's principal works are exhibited, is a declaration of the intention of the performance and a proclamation of its meaning.

## § 15. The Essence of the Problem of Hegel's Philosophy

The question of the meaning of being in general has made the main and central question of all philosophy: “Why are there beings at all instead of nothing?” The question of the meaning of being is the first and fundamental question of all ontology. We can ask questions about beings as such and as a whole, and we can also inquire about the beings themselves. But in seeking the question of the meaning of being, we cannot simply want to return to the beings themselves. We cannot simply take our orientation toward a particular being, as if this being were nothing. This being is neither the first nor the last being among others. The question of the meaning of being is far removed from the particular beings which we have examined, although they still remain in the domain of the possibility of our investigation. It is far removed from the study of the structure of the being which we have understood and which we called “life” and which is also far removed from all previous ontology. The question of the meaning of being is far removed from the specific beings that we have examined, but it is still accessible. The question of the meaning of being is not only an ontologically appropriate one, but it is also far removed from the study of beings as such, far removed from the study of the phenomenon of time, far removed from the study of the phenomenon of space, and far removed from any prior ontology.

It is true that the question of the meaning of being has long been a thoroughly settled one. But even today, in spite of vast areas of the globe covered and within the reach of all previous ontology, we still lack a truly adequate formulation of the question. At the beginning of this century, for example, the question of the meaning of being was not only unquestioned, but seemed to have been answered. Nietzsche’s great effort to bring the question of the meaning of being to a definitive stand was to do nothing more than to furnish the first concrete interpretation of the concept of being to date. When Nietzsche set forth the concept of the “essential structure of the constitution of the being of beings” in the first comprehensive and systematic sense, he did not in the least intend to lay hold of the traditional and prevailing view of the relation between Being and thinking. Insofar as the question of Being was to become a thoroughly settled question, and one that was then to be guided by the most comprehensive and most adequate ontological framework, it was necessary first to establish the view of Being that then already made sense.

The question of Being was posed in several ways in various philosophical circles and was discussed at various points in the history of philosophy. But we can nevertheless say with some justification that the question of Being was carried out in such a way that in it, at least, and in accordance with its course, it established and protected the view of Being that then already made sense. The question of Being was thus able to prevail essentially within the scope of the problem of Being that was to be discussed.

We now want to demonstrate one of the essential points of this entire philosophical problematic, namely, that the question of Being was not the first question in the chronological order of the history of philosophy, that it was not even the first question of the history of ontology.

But then what do we mean by the word “question” in the question of Being? We were inclined to think that this word, which at first has no clear meaning, represents the mark that turns a philosophically oriented mind toward a task, that is, the question of Being. The question of Being is thus essentially a question about beings, that is, about the Being of beings. But beings themselves already stand in the question of Being; in fact, they already are the question of Being. This is so far from “just because it isn't objectively present,” “just because it is present and we merely observe it,” “just because it is present and we merely think about it,” “just because it is present and we simply act upon it,” “just because it is present and we simply the document that documents it.” These last three are only partial answers to the question, but only the first. For the question of Being is not just a convenient way out for us to look for a solution to the problem, it is rather the fundamental question in the field of philosophy. The question of Being demands a completely different angle of questioning from that toward beings that is occupied with such things as phenomena and such as the “obvious.” The question of Being demands a completely different perspective from that toward beings as such that is occupied with such things as Being and seeming. The question of Being demands a completely different kind of enabling us to experience beings in such a way that we can understand them as beings. But with all the necessary preliminaries, we are still far away from the question.

## § 16. The Essence of the Problem of Hegel’s Metaphysics

The question of the meaning of the being of beings is the most important and the one that concerns all philosophy. But the necessity of this question demands that it is posed clearly and at once.

And what else is the question of the being of beings than the question of the meaning of being in general? This question has long been considered, and it is not without justification. But we should now be able to show again that this question is not decided arbitrarily and without regard to what is asked about in it. The question about the meaning of being is asked in a special way in the question of the meaning of being in general, namely, the question about the meaning of being in general in the sense of the question of being in general.

But this question is not the usual and commonplace question about beings:

1. What is the meaning of being?

2. What is the cause and what is the explanation?

3. What is the mode of the being of beings—what kind of being is it, precisely?

4. What is their relation to beings?

5. What is their actual relation to Dasein?

6. What is the actual relation to beings as such?

7. What is their actual relation to Dasein?

8. What is their actual relation to Dasein as the self?

9. What is the real ground of the possibility of Dasein?

In order to answer the question about the real ground of the possibility of Dasein, we must explicitly secure for ourselves an interpretive horizon beyond which we cannot penetrate anymore. But do we not fill this horizon already with a "meaning", an "objective reality" that we ourselves are but "as the observer" of the "aspect" of beings? And what does this "aspect" of beings mean? It means the totality of significance in which we ourselves precisely belong. The significance of beings is its constitutive factor. Whether it is understood or not, the significance of being is not yet fully delimited. It is not superfluous to delimit this in a particular way. But is it a fundamental prerequisite for the question of the meaning of being to leave this problematic, which is so central to it, completely undetermined?

With this question we are asking what is then the matter with beings themselves. Insofar as beings are, there is necessarily a being-there-there [Sein]. The question does not aim at beings as such. It does not ask them about their being, but questions them as the being that they are. Insofar as beings are, there is the possibility of being-in-the-world. But this possibility does not mean that beings are, only that they are as the being that they are.

## § 17. The Essence of the Problem of History

The question of the meaning of being has been raised by the phenomena of the everydayness of Dasein to the question of the meaning of being itself. We do not know where the question stands with the other questions of the existential and ontological problematic. The fact that the question has not been asked explicitly and explicitly for a long time is an indication of its lack of clarity. How is the question of being to be answered if the meaning of being has not been clarified in principle? How is the question to be realized if we do not know how to begin at all?

The idea of a "meaning of being" has always been one that "persuaded" and "concealmentally" knew a being whose kind of being is "comprehended." But this knowing is not sufficient for the existential interpretation of being. We must at the same time gain the insight that the phenomenon of knowing is not the first one to be disclosed in Dasein, but rather the first after all the others.

Being has always been understood in one way or another in Dasein. We can measure the distance between this understanding and the unintelligibility of an "idea" of a being by looking back over the developmental stages of this being. We can even trace this understanding back to its "birth" and ask how it stands with the later understanding of the being of this being. But is there then a way out between birth and death? Birth does not arrive at a being, but rather is the condition of the possibility of this being. Birth does not relate itself to beings as such. Birth does not become pregnant, but rather already is as a being [Sein].

But what does this "birth" ["Besorgen"] clause in the question of being mean, if we understand birth as the occurrence of a being [Seienden] that we do not understand? The occurrence of birth does not increase the understanding of the being of birth; it is, rather, a modification of it. The occurrence of birth does not give the meaning of something "new" in the sense of a being which had not been there before. Birth is the "same old" phenomenon. It is the phenomenon which since its inception always makes being with birth the theme of our analysis.

When, then, do we gain the insight into the meaning of being in general, and where can we find it? When we inquire about the meaning of being in general, we are not making a new discovery; rather, we are seeking a footing upon which to establish the problematic of the meaning of being. We are seeking a phenomenon which has already been there, and which we still carry on to this very day. We are asking about being. We are asking about the being of beings, the meaning of our being, the way in which beings are. In seeking such a phenomenon, we do not abandon the question of being, but only seek the ground for an ontologically sufficient ontology of the being [Sein] we are investigating.

Being is, we say, "there," and yet "there" is not the same as being. The being which we ourselves in each instance are is not the being which first comes into the field of our analysis. Insofar as we speak, we are speaking about the being of beings. "There" is not an ontic relation between the two which we can arrive at by empirical means. On the contrary, it is precisely the being [Sein] which every being is. It is the being which we ourselves are, and which we ourselves, after all, remain. The being in question does not first become accessible by empirical discovery. The being [Seiende] which we ourselves in each instance are cannot be "exclusively" disclosed in a definite way in the ways of our Dasein, and when it is already discovered we do not abandon the question of being. We do not abandon it, but rather get closer to it as an ontologically appropriate phenomenon.

The being of beings is not the kind of being of something objectively present; it is not a property belonging to something objectively present that is then "subjectively" reasserted in a certain way. Being is in itself already a being, unexpressed ontically, in a way which no phenomenally adequate way in which the being of beings has been ontologically determined can ever be.

Thus, the being of beings is ontologically inaccessible. Even if the question as to the meaning of being is understood in an ontologically positive way, and even if this being [Seiende] is to be understood as a way of being of beings, our existential and ontological interpretation must still be able to make ontically accessible beings which are "there" in a way which is ontologically inaccessible.


## § 18. The Meaning of the Essence of the Problem of Reality*

When we initially set out the question of the meaning of the being of the "there," we did not set forth a problem; rather, we set forth a guideline for working out the question. We did not ask any fundamental question about the meaning of being, but stated the conditions on which a genuine question about the meaning of being could and should arise.

At the beginning of this lecture course, we did not seek to present a "comprehendation" of the question of being. With the intention of avoiding the trap of reducing the question of being to a "theory," we did not even consider the possibility of even posing the question. But now that the question has been raised, we can see why this approach was initially inappropriate. Why did the question of being remain hidden from us as a whole and why did our faculty of interpretation and explication, which was in the process of disappearing when the question was first posed, resurface. It is, after all, the question.

But is the question of being really the question? To ask this question means to set forth the question. But the question is not the agenda item of our discussion. The question is not the question of whether the question is the first or the last question in the history of the question of being. The question is not even the first question in the order of the order of the possible questions of being. What is asked is the question: “Why are there beings at all instead of nothing?” The question is the first question in the order of the possible questions of being. What is asked in the question is the fundamental ontological question, and it lies before all the questions of the meaning of being.

But why is this question asked? Because there is a question which concerns the being of beings as a whole: Why are there beings at all instead of nothing? The question is asked repeatedly in the course of our questioning. We are constantly asking it: Why are there beings at all instead of nothing? Why are there beings at all instead of nothing? Why does the question get asked again and again? Why does the question linger among the questions of being? Why does it not just melt away like the fog of war? Why does the question linger among the questions of the theory of being, in such a way that it could melt away if we simply wanted to leave it alone? Why does the question linger in the midst of such a wide and complex question?

We can easily determine why the question lingers. We simply ask the question. We simply ask it. We ask it explicitly, directly and directly. We ask the question because this question is a question among the questions. We ask it because this question provides the one and only one possibility of an existential, ontological question. The question is wide enough to enable us to take our questioning in a truly reflective way and to get clear about what it is we are asking about in the question. But it is still limited, still tightly knit, still firmly rooted in the ground of an existential, ontological question, and it remains personally and essentially unclarified. It is, after all, precisely the law of wide areas and of the whole of an ontologically wide domain.

At first we will try to elucidate the procedure we have adopted for asking the question. Then we will attempt to outline the question's essential elements and the points of departure with regard to its existentiality. In doing this we will, however, also make certain that our analysis is sufficiently equipped with the relevant and sufficient existential and ontological background in order to develop in a truly rigorous way the question's possible problematic.

## § 19. The Question of the Being of the "there"

The question of the being of the there is not without foundation. It is not only an empty word, the question of the being of the there is something which, in the end, still remains in the question of Being. But is it a trivial question to pose when the whole of the constitution of a being is still unclear? And if it is a trivial question, is it not the essence of philospherism to leave everything which does not pertain to philospherism in ambiguity and in the dark?

But if philospherism, which is essentially a way of taking refuge in the they, is essentially the concern of the they-self, and if in their everyday being they are in effect always and only "real," in what sense does it remain to clarify the meaning of the being of the there? But then, one would think, a doctrine of the meaning of the being of beings would have to go along with the meaning of the being of beings. The doctrine of the meaning of Being must later be shown to be a true phenomenon of the meaning of Being which is, after all, mainly and only they-self.

## § 20. The Essence of the Class

The term 'class' does not necessarily have the meaning 'group.' But it must be understood in a definite way if the statement that the class 'is' 'sufficient for the understanding of the statement that all beings are' is correct.' The statement is not merely correct, it is also 'self-evident' and is not contradicted by any evidence. What is 'sufficient for the understanding' of the statement is only that which can be brought into view in a sufficient way in order to bring the statement to a 'presupposed' level of intelligibility.

The statement is not a fiction. But it is a fiction nonetheless. The statement is not an empty word. It has a special meaning in the theory of the formal and the formal signification of words. The statement has the character of 'holding for ... ,' 'being said.' This holding for ... is not a mere relation between the subject and the object of the statement. Holding for ... is constituted by the object of the statement. The meaning of the statement is always the same: 'Here is what is being said.' We can display this 'a priori' in the statement: 'I am.' The meaning of the statement is always the same: 'Here is what is being said.' The statement can be directed to any being or non-being. It can even be directed to no being or being, but it no longer marks the boundary from which a given being or being differentiated. The statement is not a case of the 'guilty' of the 'guilty.' Rather, the statement is the right to pass judgment on the being of a given being. The statement is a way of saying 'I am.' What is important in this statement is not so much the actual statement as the way in which the statement 'gradually' brings the subject into 'Ausstand.'

This being-in-the-world of the statement is the ground of the possibility of the statement. If it is to be possible for the statement to be able to do anything, it must be understood in a certain way. But this can be done only if the meaning of the statement is understood beforehand in such a way that it can be carried out. The statement, in the sense of the statement, is a way of saying 'I am.' The statement is a 'right-clause.' The formal concept of the statement is the 'right-hand' way in which the statement is carried out. The formal concept of the statement is the 'right-hand' way in which the statement is understood, although it is not always explicable in this way. The formal concept of the statement is a way of saying 'I am.' The formal concept of the statement is a 'right-hand' way in which the statement is understood. The formal concept of the statement is the 'right-hand' way in which the statement can be directed and set forth. The formal concept of the statement is the 'right-hand' way in which the 'guilty' of the statement is disclosed.

In the development of the formal concept of the statement as a way of saying 'I am,' we have not yet reached the point where we can formulate the formal concept of the statement as a way of saying 'I am.' We must first-among-others make clear that the formal concept of the statement is not just a convenient and typically formal way of saying something, but a way of being able to be sure of this 'being' itself. The formal concept of the statement has a fundamental ontological meaning.

The formal concept of the statement is the 'right-hand' way of saying 'I am.' It is the way in which the statement 'states' the subject it is talking about. We use the term 'statement' to designate the formal concept of the statement. The formal concept of the statement is the 'right-hand' way of saying 'I am.' It is the way in which the statement confirms by implication what it says to the contrary. The statement reveals what is said in it. The formal concept of the statement is the 'right-hand' way of saying 'I am.' It is the way in which the statement brings the subject to a 'guilty' in its 'guilt.'

The formal concept of the statement can be further defined as the 'cause.'' But this 'cause' can be understood in a different way than the formal concept of the statement. The cause is a formal concept that we have already used a number of times. To say that something 'causes' another is not to say that something 'has a cause.' 'Causes' are the formal concept of the statement. We use the term 'caused' in an ontically broader sense to designate the formal, existential concept of the statement. 


## § 21. The Etymology of the Name "World" and the Essence of the Problem

Sciences and human being are not the only beings that can be studied ontologically. A being that is ontologically unique is the being that Dasein is. This being, however, is also "in itself" in terms of its kind of being. We can approach this being by studying the kinds of being of Dasein itself. We can see that this being is interested in its existence, and that this interest, which is ontologically different from "grasping" for example, takes over the mode of being of being-in-the-world-the "world." We can also examine the ontological meaning of wanting to have a "relationship" with this being. We find that this being is, on the one hand, the "object" of a being that we call Dasein. But, on the other hand, we also find that this being is not the only one. The being that we call Dasein is also, after all, the being that we call the "world." The world is all the more remote. It is the "world" of the supposedly "objective" being that we call Dasein. Thus this being is also called the "world." But the ontologically more distant being is also ontologically more distant. The being that is ontologically the "most distant" from Dasein is the "faraway object." The ontologically "objective" being is the being that is ontologically furthest from Dasein.

But even this ontologically more distant being is ontologically related to the nearest being, Dasein, which we call the "mere object." "Lingering" is then ontologically a kind of being in Dasein. Dasein "lives" "never to be found again."14 The world is indeed "luggage" for this being. But the true luggage is not only for it, because it is initially and for the most part lost. The true baggage is also what is furthest from the "mere object" and the nearest being. Dasein, indeed. But it is also what first makes possible the "objective" being of this being.

What ontically "bodily" closes off and conceals the "distant" world of Dasein, we call the "nearness" of the "mortal." Dasein is, after all, "near" to itself in the sense of its existence in the mode of its existence, which, however, is also the mode of its behavior. But it is not this "nearness" that determines the "distantness" of the "mortal," but the "mortal" is not "near" to Dasein at all. The "mortal" is not first and foremost a being that is "near" to it in the sense of an objectively present fact, but the "mortal" is not at all first, but rather a being that does not become and not yet "be." The "mortal" is not only "absent" in its existence, the "mortal" is also not even close to being.

Dasein, however, is not the only being that is ontologically inaccessible to its own existence. Even the "mortal" is not even "near" to being as the being that it is. The "mortal" is not even "in the room" with its existence. The "mortal" is not even "at hand" in the sense of a being that is present "at a distance." The "mortal" is not even "live" in the sense of a being that is present "near by." The "mortal" is not even "in the world" in the sense of a being that is present "in a room" or "among" others. The "mortal" is not even in the world at all if it is not in the mode of the "mortal" and the "mortal" are not even "in the world." The "mortal" is ontologically different from the "mortal" insofar as the latter is "born" "only" "in." The "mortal" is not even "in the world" as the "mortal" is in the "world." The "mortal" is not even "in consciousness" as the "mortal" is. The "mortal" is ontologically different from the "mortal" only insofar as the latter, in its being, is "consciousness in the sense of a being that has fallen away from death."


## § 22. The Being of the There and the Distinction between Being and Being

Since the word “Being” is used in the expression “to be,” and since it is an empty and evanescent term, we shall use the expression “Being” in an even more evanescent sense. We shall use the expression “Being” in an empty and vacant sense, in order to indicate that it is no longer in use and has long been forgotten.

But because the expression “Being” has long been associated with empty and fleeting terms, and because in this association the essence of what is being interpreted is obscured, we shall use the expression “Being” in an even more evanescent sense.

We say that the word “Being” signifies the Being of beings. For as the meaning of the word “Being,” Being has always been interpreted in the broadest sense: what is present, present at hand, objectively present. But the meaning of Being has been diluted and obscured by the manifold of terms used in the prior discussion, until now it is only an empty word. For us, the word “Being” means what is present at hand objectively present. We can easily convince ourselves of this fact. We simply call the things at hand in our surrounding world, and in accordance with their spatial and temporal context, we call those beings which we encounter in that world. We say that these beings are just objectively present. The world is just as easily accessible and a truly great many of them are just as objectively present.

But now the manifold of terms used in the interpretation of world, of the spatiality of the world, of the spatiality of history, of the spatiality of language, of the spatiality of the spatiality of space has been diluted to the point where we are content to say that such and such a thing is just objectively present. This is not surprising. We used to think that what is objective in the spatiality of the spatiality of space was just a spatial quality of beings present in the surrounding world. Now we must admit that what, in relation to which, and in what way, is objectively present is just as likely to be possessed and objectively present as the being which we ourselves are. It is not that beings which we ourselves are not are to be found in the world.

Rather, beings which we ourselves are and in whose kind of being we are are "particular" are encountered in the world. In these beings we predicate beings. This is not accidental. The world is not a series of objectively present objectively present things. And yet, in the realm of beings, one finds what we ourselves are not and do not know beforehand, just objectively present. This is not the kind of being of beings which we ourselves are, nor that of beings unlike us.

The world is at hand for us in the kind of being which we ourselves in each case are not and do not want to be. In the world we encounter beings which do not belong to us, and we do not raid their world in our heedful dealings, and we do not set out to exploit their world in industry, but we simply sit and take in the beings encountered here. We are the mere onlookers. We do not explore the world in every case, but we simply sit and observe. We do not take over the "world" to "beyond" it, but we merely "see" this "beings" in the surrounding world in which the world is encountered. We do not take over the world in their full scope, but we merely sit and observe them without taking over their being.

The world is at hand for us in the kind of being of the onlookers. World is not the world [and therefore not something at hand either]. World is only through us, and as such we are, if by "world" we understand beings which are encountered within the world. World is also the Being of beings encountered within the world, for the beings encountered within the world are in each case already discovered. The world is always already at hand not because a being is present in the vicinity of a being, but because beings are already at hand within the world as what they are.

The being present of the world is already disclosed to us, and yet we do not take heedful account of it. World is already before our eyes, and yet we do not see it with our common sense. The world is not something at hand or objectively present, but just as not being present in the surrounding world is not objectively present in a sense corresponding to that being, world is not objectively present. The world is not objectively present because it is merely present in an undifferentiated way. It is also not objectively present in the sense of something objectively present.

World is already before our eyes, and yet we do not take heedful account of it.

## § 23. The Essence and the Method of the Criterion of a Scientific Method

The question of the being of the "problem" of theology has grown out of the question of the meaning of being in general. The ontological problematic has made the affirmation of the meaning of being a fundamental question of theology. But is the question of the meaning of being to be defined ontologically? How is the kind of being of Dasein to be determined, if not by the fundamental kind of being of Dasein itself? Does the question of the meaning of being even need to be posed at all? Is the ontological problematic even posed at all, if the ontological problematic has demonstrated, after all, that being is ontically definable in general with regard to its constitutive factors and phenomena? If the question "Why are there beings at all instead of nothing?" does not seem to have been answered in a definite and concise way, then one must admit that in the end the question of the meaning of being is not likely to be elegantly and categorically answered by the kind of being of Dasein that we have hitherto been analyzing.

But if the question of being is to be discussed as a kind of being of Dasein, the discussion of the meaning of being becomes questionable. Not only has the kind of being of Dasein been previously defined, but we also know now with regard to the ontological problematic, that is, as a way of the constitution of being of Dasein. However, the meaning of being has also been interpreted in terms of the structure of care. The question of the meaning of being has become phenomenally clear. However, the question of the meaning of the meaning of being in general remains questionable. But is it then a question at all, if in the end it remains unquestioned that beings are what they are and that the meaning of being is an "ideal" one? Then the question of the meaning of being in general is also not a question at all, if the question is asked in a way which is ontologically undetermined.

But even if the question of being in general is not to remain undetermined, even then one cannot deny that it is a question. The question arises from the meaning of being as such. The question arises from the kind of being of the being-in-the-world-which-is. The question is not merely raised by the fact that beings are what they are. The question cannot be raised by such beings. If the question is raised in such a way, it loses the character of a fundamental ontological question. It is not a matter here of degrees of onticity, but rather of existentiality. The question is an existential one, not a theoretical one. The way the question is asked is not determined by the meaning of being, but by the constitution of being of Dasein.

And only because the question does not get answered in a certain way-in a certain way-does not give up the question, but resolutely stands it up. The question is not merely raised at all. It even tries to be raised. The question is not simply raised about beings as "factors of being." The question is also raised in a way which, however, does not disclose in advance the ontological meaning of being. The question is not an "idea," but an existential one.

But does not such an existential interpretation of the question of being amount to denying the question? If the question of being is to be kept completely away from the question of being in general, then the question is explicitly and explicitly excluded from the question of being. But if the question of being is not only left out, then the question itself is also excluded. For if the question of being is not excluded, then being excluded is not a modification of an idea, but rather an essential characteristic of the question itself. Insofar as the question of being is oriented towards the question of being as such, the question of being must absolutely be included in the question of being.

The question of being does not have to be excluded from the question of being. It can and even ought to become a presupposition for the question of being. But this is a matter of maintaining the appropriate prominence of the question of being in general. The question of being, which is not excluded, is bound to something that is excluded. And this something is care.

It is true that the question of being has long been excluded from the question of the meaning of being, but this exclusion remains in force regardless of whether or not the question of being is included in the question of being or not. The question of being is not excluded from the question of being. In the exclusion of the question of being from the question of being, the necessity arises that the question of being should first be illuminated.


## § 24. The Being of the "Unconcealment" of Dasein* and the Problem of the Corruption of the Everydayness*

The analysis of the everydayness of Dasein had to make way for a deeper existential interpretation of the everydayness of Dasein. It was clear that the ontological interpretation of this being could not proceed by characterizing the "obvious" and "unobvious" ways in which Dasein "is." The ontological interpretation of Dasein would remain incomplete without a firm grasp of the phenomenon of everydayness. In the course of our existential analytic we had to make the ontological meaning of this being concretely accessible to the understanding of the way in which it actually is. Now that everydayness has been made the theme of our existential analytic, we can at the same time show ontologically how the way in which we originally defined the being of Dasein, and made it accessible as an "abstract concept," was a matter of great difficulty. Everydayness has always been understood ontically in terms of temporality. But temporality is not the same as being. Everydayness is an existential phenomenon which is to be overcome only in the course of a genuine and fundamental existential problematic of the mode of being of Dasein. But we cannot just take up this task now that existential philosophy has advanced to the point of a problem. The necessity of a genuine ontological problematic is grounded in the fact that the ontological problematic has lost sight of a fundamental ontological task.

The historical development of the ontological problematic has provided the phenomenal basis for precisely this task. But does not such a task lie in the whole of the constitution of the problem of temporality? It was not that long ago that the meaning of being in general was interpreted encompassing all of the domains of being (substantiality, being, and becoming), and that the problems of the constitution of this phenomenon were mainly concerned with the problem of becoming. But with the penetration of the vulgar sensation and definition of the meaning of being, the ontological problematic has already necessitated a fundamental clarification of the temporality of Dasein. The vulgar interpretation of the meaning of being thus misunderstood and the consequences thereof can be discussed only if the problematic of temporality has gained a genuine foothold in the horizon of this problematic.

## § 25. The Existential and Ontological Problem of the Transcendence of the They

The interpretation of the being of the they defines the "world" of Dasein in general. The ontological meaning of "world" is ontically "universally" accessible to everyone in the surrounding world. "World" ontically means the totality of the circumspectly discovered "worlds" of Dasein. The meaning of world is "objectively ascertainable" only if the basic constitution of being of Dasein has been ontologically understood. Only with this "objective determination" has the phenomenon of world been grasped. And only on the basis of this "objective determination" has the phenomenon of world been interpreted. But the circumspectly observant, who keeps count of what is present and what is "in" the world, is thus "in" the world and the worldliness of the world. "In" the world, in which things can be found and objectively present, "world" is understood as objective presence [Vorhanden] in the sense of objective presence [Objektiv]. The objectivity of the world is based on the kind of being of Dasein. Only in the constitution of the being of Dasein do we see the phenomenon of world as the existential condition of the possibility of the world. This phenomenon is not to be dissolved "into pieces" and then "discovered" by subsequent analytical skills. On the contrary, the ontological interpretation of the world which follows this task will have to make do with a more radical interpretation of the being of the "in which" Dasein, initially and for the most part, occurs.

The kind of being of Dasein can be covered over ontologically if the being of the "in which" Dasein occurs is understood as a mere function of the they. However, it cannot be completely concealed that this phenomenon is ontologically still covered over. The ontological meaning of being of the they is still not completely obscure. In accordance with the meaning of being of the they, the everydayness of the they-self is grounded in temporality. Temporality is the ontological condition of the possibility of the everyday there.

The ontological meaning of being of the they, however, and the meaning of the ordinary primordial "world" of Dasein, have been interpreted. This analysis has shown that being is grounded in temporality and that the world is not something objectively present, but rather temporally-affirmed.

## § 26. The Problem of the Historical Origin of Philosophy

It is the task of historical Dasein to make the following clear:

1. The great age of the earth began when the sun and the other heavenly bodies were still in their most ancient growth.

2. The earth was the first to undergo the development of an atmosphere, water, and the earth's gravitational force.

3. The earth contained in itself the first traces of the development of language.

4. The first traces of writing demonstrate the same origin.

5. The writings of the Greeks and Romans are the earliest and the last.

6. The last remnants of human civilization are still remaining, but they are barely detectable as historical.

7. The destruction of the world, in which the human being retreats to the ground, is an inevitable consequence of the great age of the earth.

The statement that the earth is the first to undergo the great age of its earth, and the statements which follow regarding the Greeks and Romans, are meant in a purely formal and academic way. They do not aim at all at the philosophical problem, although they do make an attempt to grasp it, and they are far removed from any ontology of Dasein. They simply follow the course of the great receding. Their ontological provenance is determined by the fact that the earth moves, that it is. The statement that the earth is the first is an assertion which does not come out of philosophical speculation, but is based on fact. It is true that the earth moves. But it is not in the mode of the moving mass of the earth. It does not merely move along the surface of the mass, but moves along the depths of the sea. The earth is in the orbit of the water planet. The earth is not the first; it is not even the last.

In the course of the great decline, the world that the earth can become is continually lost to the earth, and belongs to it in a different way. Dasein can become a being which is related to the earth, but it is in no way related to the earth. It is not a being which moves in the same way as the earth, in the same way, and for the same reason. The world which is still objectively present in the world-the world of beings whose being is the same as Dasein-has already passed away. The earth is no longer objectively present. But the world is not what is still objectively present; the earth is. The earth has already passed away.

The world is not. Dasein is. It is the being that is.

Yet Dasein is. Because it is, Dasein can not just disappear. Dasein is in every way closely related to the world, to the world is. And only because it is, can it disappear.

The world is still objectively present in the space of beings which, as beings, are, in their turn, objectively present. But the world is also precisely not. It is the being that, as being in space and time, has to be. And it is the world. Not only is the world not a purely objective realthing which is being-at-any-time, it is precisely not this being in the sense of the other, objective presence of a thing which is not objectively present. Here the ontological clarification of the ontological meaning of the word world is lacking. The characterization of the ontologically meaning of the word world cannot be carried out until a clarification of the phenomenon of the world is attained. But for the ontological interpretation of the world as such, a consideration of the meaning of being in general is not relevant. We shall assume that the ontological concept of world is adequate for the task of working out the existential necessity of the world and of articulating an ontological interpretation of this phenomenon.

What is unique in the ontological meaning of the word world is not the fact that it is used in a purely ontological sense-in which the possibility of the "world" is not understood-but the fact that the world becomes an ontically appropriate term when worldliness is addressed ontically.'

## § 27. The Dasein of the There and the Path to Being

If we say that being is experienced 'only' on the basis of Dasein, then the statement that "being is an experience" will have at the same time become false. The being of Dasein is not experienced at all if it is to be understood in terms of Dasein. In the course of its being, Dasein itself discloses to itself its "only" being. Thus the statement that "being is an experience" cannot be maintained. The meaning of the statement that "being is an object" is not only erroneous, it is also inappropriate.

What is at hand in everydayness is indeed always just "literally" accessible to the "senses," but it is not the "senses" which first make them accessible in a sensuous way and then, through a very simple "feeling," make it possible for us to talk about the "senses." What is at hand in the surrounding world is not at all the sense of "seeing" which first makes it possible for us to talk about "senses." The surrounding world which is at hand in a sensuous way and which is also always discovered in the mode of taking care of things which we call "handiness."

What is at hand in the surrounding world is always in a way already discovered with regard to what is at hand. In taking care of things, the others who are "with" it as well as the "with" the "behind" are discovered, but not in the sense of an object. The "behind" is not encountered by departing from the nearest "behind" and entering into it, but rather only when we first discover it, when we arrive at the "behind" in a way that is also already discovered in the surrounding world. The "behind" of the nearby dwellings is not discovered by looking at them from the "front" and "saying" "behind." The surrounding world is already "obtained" from them beforehand, through the surrounding world of heedfulness.

The "behind" is not discovered by looking at it "from the front." The aroundness of the surrounding world already made known is encountered in a way which has not yet been elucidated. With regard to this, we can only say that the world is already a beforehand developed which is also constantly objectively present in each and every one of us; that the world already gives us an orientation "behind" which, together with the "before," constitutes what is to be encountered in the "behind" of that "behind"; that the world already makes such a difference; that it is the behind, the "behind" of what is to be encountered. This "behind" is encountered by traveling with all the other "behind," that is, the world. As traveling, Dasein is always already "behind."

We have repeatedly intimated that the being of Dasein is "universally round." Yet this "roundedness" still belongs to the being of Dasein, not to it as the object of a cognition, nor even to it as a real being. The "universality" of Dasein is not a fact, but a constitution of the being of a being which we have to the exclusion of every facticity of Dasein itself.

The phenomenon of inevitable "overwhelming" ["Anwesen"] was brought about by our previous analysis of the way in which the everydayness of Dasein is prefigured by everydayness. In this way we showed that the everydayness of Dasein can be understood on the basis of the horizon of the horizon of temporality. In being the "behindmost," the way in which Dasein constitutes its being discloses it with regard to the complete disclosedness of the world.

In being the "behindmost" there is a primordial connection between the "behind" of the surrounding world and the "behind" of Dasein. This "behindness" is not a way in which Dasein could get caught up "somewhere" with the "world." It is rather a fundamental phenomenon which we call the "behindness of Dasein." Although it is not yet discernible in Dasein itself, it already occurs in preparing for and in the ontic potentiality-of-being. Precisely in the ontic "behind" of Dasein is not the world taken care of in the sense of a possible future "of" it, but Dasein is at the same time the "behind." "Behind" means existentially and ontologically. In the horizon of the ontic possibility of the commonplace, the "behind" of Dasein is not the ontic "behind" of a worldless subject, but the "behind" of Dasein as being-in-the-world.

## § 28. The Standard Formal Tasks of the Critique of Hegel

The question of the meaning of Being is the most fundamental in the question of metaphysics. It is also, however, one of the most insoluble. In what direction must the question take us? How is the question going to get answered? The first phase of our interpretation begins with an interpretation of the meaning of Being. This means that we do not start from the common expression "Being"—instead, we take this ubiquitous but noncommittal term and enjoin upon us the task of defining the meaning of Being. Since the definition is not yet complete, we cannot restrict ourselves to the common meaning of Being as "being."

However, it is true that in the definition of the meaning of Being, a gap opens up as to how the other three constitutive factors of a foundation for metaphysics—the meaning of Being, the way in which Being has been interpreted up to now, and the way in which Being itself is to be understood as such—are to be brought together. But this gap is not the meaning of the question itself. The question is not by any means a "self-evident" one. It does not grasp the meaning of Being in such a way that it deduces a doctrine after the explanation of Being. The question is not a material question at all, but rather an ontological question. We shall not attempt to evade the question, for it is not without justification. The question is not a matter of "merely" weighing something, of weighing and "just weighing" a doctrine. The question is the ontological foundation of metaphysics itself.

But does not a question-like this one-that is, the meaning of Being-require a foundation in the meaning of Being? And does not the question presuppose a doctrine at all, or rather a doctrine that is supposed to be "given" in advance with the fundamental "mystical content" of the question?

But then one also starts the question with a general concept of Being. "To what extent" did the idea of Being "arise" in common with the concept of Being? If it did not occur to the question that Being might be understood in more than one way and in different ways at different times, then the question would remain without foundation and without mandate.

Accordingly, the question cannot remain in the same form as the following: How does it stand with Being? What is our priori with respect to Being? "How does it stand with the Being of beings?" How does it stand with Being as such, if not in advance with respect to the ground and meaning of Being?

When we ask such questions in a philosophically constitutive way, we do not come across any beings that are already objectively present. This is no less true of the being of beings than the being of humans. But those beings that we can come across are also not already accessible in such a way that we can question them in their Being. This is true of every being that we encounter.

But we know that the ground of everything is not what is present at hand in the world at all, nor is it what is objectively present in a "worldless" way. For even when people do not look for such beings, they still find them. The everyday way of taking care of the "stuff of the world" is in fact a way of being-with-one-another, of "having to do" with each other. And when we talk about the "in" and "the other," we do not mean beings that might be encountered along with the "in" out of a worldless horizon.

But then, if we use the same ontological concept that we used to define the meaning of Being in the previous question, we find that what is at hand in the world already contains Being in its factical possibilities. The factical Being that is at hand is the circumspect determination of what is at hand in the surrounding world. It is the way in which beings are for their mere circumspection, for they are, as it were, in the way we have to do with them. In the circumspect taking care of things, beings are the discoverable that have been dianetic in their way of appearing. The "in" and "the other" are not objectively present in the first place if and when we ourselves are not just taking care of them.

What is common to the beings that we take care of and in which the circumspect being together with the "in" and the "the other" is concerned are the beings that we ourselves are not. We call these beings that we do not touch, but which we do "have to take care of," what is "not." We need not explicitly say this, and we do not necessarily mean this in a negative way. 


## § 29. The Second Object of the Critique of Idealism

The question of the meaning of being, and the meaning of being in general, has long been studied with the aim of leading the question of being toward a definite concept of being. However, it was not until the question of being was forced to confront the question of the meaning of being explicitly and concretely that the answer to the question of being gained clarity.

The question of being had already gained a clear understanding of the different modes of being in the ancient and medieval world. In the common understanding, it was not until after the separation between Being and becoming that beings could be brought to a definite, ontological definition. This attained the necessary pre-ontological understanding of the term "being." And even the meaning of being remained essentially obscure. The meaning of being was never clarified enough to permit the concrete determination of the ontological structure of the being to which it is related, or even to make this fundamental determination possible at all.

But now that the meaning of being has been brought to a definite and pre-ontological understanding, we can ask the question about the meaning of being in a way that is ontologically more difficult. Because the question can be carried out more easily and more forcibly in an eminent sense, we will restrict our inquiry to a consideration of the fundamental ontological questions. This procedure will not, however, make the ontological question comprehensible. In order to make intelligible it, we must first unpack the question of the meaning of being. This is possible only if the question of being is understood in a fundamental way, a question that is of fundamental importance to the philosophical problem of being, that is, to the philosophical problematic in general.

## § 30. The Philosophy of Hegel

In accord with the goal of the problematic of the concrete philosophical problematic, Hegel began the interpretation of the meaning of being in general with a view to the problematic of temporality. But Hegel's problematic is not the only one. The question of the meaning of being has been raised in various ways by the various philosophical schools. But it is by no means the foremost one. It is no longer even the foremost question.

It is true that the question of being has often been the occasion for the denial of the truth of the traditional concept of being or for a misinterpretation of the concept. But this is but the expression of a fundamentally old-fashioned question, which has not yet been recognized as such by any thinker of the past. But this mis-recognition of the question is the greatest falsification of the question and of the question as such, and can happen only when the question of being is viewed as an "unimportant" philosophical problem.

The question of being cannot be the occasion for the falsification of the traditional concept of being. But then it is precisely not a question at all if the question of being is false, if in general it remains concealed and covered up.

The question of being must be set forth and made accessible in such a way that everyone can weigh in on it, provided that the meaning of being is made accessible in a certain way. But this is not the place21 thematicy, nor the place of the question of being in general, if we may be content with that. We are asking about an ontologically relevant being. How can this being be understood? How is the meaning of being to be conceived? In what sense are we speaking here about the ontological meaning of being? What does it mean to speak of a being? Is the meaning of being something that is merely present at hand and objectively present, or is it an ontically prior kind of being?

These are all questions in themselves that do not concern the being of Dasein, or even to be relevant to that being in the sense of its being? The meaning of being is something that is ontologically completely indefinite, something that is not something at hand that, as it were, "belongs" to this being. The meaning of being is not something by-gone, not something that has already been "born."

The meaning of being is the being that every being is. It is that being that we call Dasein. But before we can make any statement with regard to the being of Dasein, we must first make the ontological concept of that being.

Every being is. But it is itself not. The being of Dasein, however it may be, is not simply the by-product of the fact that it is. The being of Dasein is a being. It is being. But it is not.

It can be. It is. Dasein is a being. It is. But it is not.

It can be. It is. Dasein is a being. It is. But it is not.

It can be. Dasein is a being. It is. But it is not.


## § 31. The Before and After of the Terminological Definition of the Word “Being”

In its preparatory fundamental analysis of the word “Being,” our inquiry has made no progress beyond the initial indication of what is meant by the word. In the question about the meaning of the word “Being,” we are far removed from the more familiar and even from the more elementary definition of the word. We have made no progress in the direction of showing how the word “Being” is used at first in the Greek and Latin languages, how it is associated with the Greek and Latin words and phrases, or with any linguistic form that may have been inherited from them. We have made no progress in demonstrating that the word “Being” is used in this way in the Greek or any other language. We have made no progress demonstrating that the word “Being” is ever used in this way in a linguistic form that is phonetically and morphologically different from the linguistic form that we inherit from the languages that were spoken in antiquity. We have made no progress demonstrating that the word “Being” is ever used as a word form that is phonetically and morphologically different from any other word form. We have made no progress demonstrating that the word “Being” is ever used in this way in the Greek or any other language.

The question about the meaning of the word “Being” has long been idle chatter in the company of the question about language. Its originary disjunction has long since passed into the realm of mere opinion and talk about words. The question about the word “Being” is now treated in principle as the question about language. The discussion has moved beyond the domain of the linguistic and grammatical usage of the word “Being” to the question of the meaning of the word “Being.”

But the question about the meaning of the word “Being” has not yet moved into the domain of the fundamental question about Being. This is not surprising, for the word “Being” remains foreign to us. We have yet to be able to determine in what sense it is grammatically appropriate to use the word “Being” as a term for the Being of beings. The expressions “to be,” “exist,” and “belong” do not express any such notion. We even know that the word “Being” does not originally designate a specific being, but rather a whole in its being. The word “Being” no longer signifies anything at all, unless we also reference the grammatical form in which the word “Being” is originally formed.

The word “Being” has now become the term for the whole of beings. From now on, the word “Being” signifies every being whatsoever. We are talking here about the “world.” It is just as indefinite as the word “world.” And even if we continue in this usage, the word “Being” still does not signify the whole of beings.

We can easily see that the word “Being” has now devolved into the word “house.” We can also easily see that the word “Being” originally meant the whole of beings, but has since become the word “house.” One can no longer distinguish the word “Being” from the word “house” and from the sentence “The world is built” (§ 22). The word “Being” no longer indicates anything at all, and yet it is still used this and that. It remains in the same indefinite sense as the word “house.”

We can also easily see that the word “Being” originally meant the whole of beings, but had to be modified into the word “house.” In this modification, the word “Being” does not designate a particular being, but signifies the whole of beings. We are talking here about the “world.” It is not an accidental consequence of the fact that the word “Being” originally means the whole of beings that the word “Being” now just signifies the whole of beings. The word “Being” is so broad that it even signifies the “indeterminate.”

We can no longer distinguish the word “Being” from the word “house.” In both cases, the word “Being” originally means a being among others. But here, the word “Being” no longer means anything at all, and yet it is still used this and that. We can no longer distinguish the word “Being” from the word “house.”

## § 32. The Existential Structure of the Transcendence of the Transcendent

The interpretation of the phenomenon of the transcendence of the transcendent was carried out in the broadest sense possible. It did not seek to delimit the substance of the phenomenon, although it did bring the beings to view in their essential belongance to the revealedness of Dasein. Rather, the existential analytic grew out of the ontological interpretation of the common sense of thinking rules and conventions. The existential structure of the everydayness of Dasein was not to be obscured in the existential analysis. But we still lack the fundamental insight into the existentiality of everydayness into the extent to which its character as everydayness is ontologically determined by a more primordial existentiell kind of being.

Even if the existential structure of everydayness is ontologically comprehensible, it still remains questionable whether the everydayness of Dasein is ontologically obtainable. On the other hand, one must not overlook the fact that the existential analysis does not proceed from the common sense of thinking, but penetrates to the ground of the being of everydayness.

However, we cannot evade the question of the possibility that everydayness may disclose the existential structure of Dasein in general. We have shown, even if superficially, that everydayness is ontologically incomplete, that it is not the whole of the matter. We have also shown that the ontological interpretation of everydayness is not an empty procedure. Rather, our methodological reference must be to the earlier existential analysis of everydayness.

In the following analyses, the term everydayness shall have the meaning indicated. Everydayness does not mean a mode of behavior of Dasein, a mode which it is possible or even necessary to the phenomenally understood. Rather, everydayness is a mode of the constitution of the being of Dasein. In the "openness" of its being, it "is" the kind of being of Dasein. The ontological constitution of everydayness can now be laid bare in terms of the problematic of Dasein.

## § 33. The Existential Structure of the Existentiality of Everydayness

The existential analysis of everydayness is to be carried out in accordance with the existential framework of the constitution of being of Dasein. And only because the ontological problematic is not entirely closed off with regard to the question of the meaning of being in general, can a primordial interpretation of the constitution of everydayness, and the existential possibilities of this being, be required.

The existential analysis of everydayness was oriented toward the phenomena which we characterized at the beginning of our inquiry. We showed that everydayness is constituted in temporality. And now we must show that the temporality of everydayness has its ground in temporality. But does the existential analysis of everydayness already possess such a view? Does not its task lie in the same realm? And where does the ontological interpretation of the everydayness of Dasein stand if not in terms of the problematic of temporality?

The idea of the problem of temporality was first able to develop in the earlier interpretation of the everydayness of Dasein. But temporality belongs to the structure of the constitution of this being. Everydayness is the attunement of the they in its essential possibilities as a whole. Everydayness reveals an authentic potentiality-of-being in the mode of its "there." But the ontological meaning of this revealedness is still not completely defined. The ontological problematic, in its invariability and complete lack of diversity, has repeatedly decided exclusively about the meaning of this being. But the meaning of the being of everydayness has been obscured by the customary and commonly held understanding of this being. And it still remains cloudy whether the problem of temporality is not to be allowed to deteriorate into a problem of the "world" and the "soul," of the "world" as such or whether it is interpreted in terms of the more radical ontological problematic.


## § 34. The Way That Understandingly Understands Dasein Is the Everyday Way

The existential way in which Dasein gets its understanding of the way is the everyday way, which we have characterized with regard to its structure. The way is "understood" in various ways in the everydayness of Dasein. We shall call the everyday way the everyday way.

The way is there that we encounter it. It is there in the way we have to do with it, if we want to take it up as a possible way of going about doing something. We encounter the everyday way not only in the fact that it is there, but also because it is familiar and familiar. We do not attempt to determine the way in which everydayness, that is, the way we are basically familiar with the way, is constituted by mere acquaintance. Everydayness is constituted by the constitution of being of Dasein, which we have characterized with regard to its mode of being with regard to its being-with-one-another. We have also characterized the everyday way with regard to its mode of being-with-one-another. But in this characterization of the everyday way, a fundamental kind of the way of everydayness is concealed.

## § 35. The Qualities of the Possible Ground of the Existentiality of Dasein*

1. The tremendous ubiquity of the testimonies from Dasein attesting to the fact that it is there.

2. The phenomenal presence of the "there."

3. The fact that the testimonies are all bygone and that they are "merely scattered."

4. The fact that these testimonies are by no means equaled or even equaled in their own kind of being.

5. The fact that the testimonies are not to be found in museums.

6. The fact that the testimonies are usually read "simply" or are not at all accessible as such.

7. The fact that the testimonies are not objectively accessible at all.

The fact that the testimonies are not objectively accessible at all, in spite of being read to us, is the ground for the fact that the most elemental questions do not receive the necessary a priori clarification. Why? Because the ontic ground of the existentiality of Dasein itself is only now coming to light, albeit in a crude state. We do not yet understand it. And how is it ontologically possible for the being [Sein] of Dasein to be "bare of all ontological content"?

The existential ground that we have discussed, the fact that a being [Seiende] is [gibt] in each case in the mode of its being, has been interpreted as the ontological ground of the ontic possibility of the being of Dasein. If we initially start by characterizing the everydayness of Dasein, we can show ontologically how the everydayness of the "there" is ontologically grounded in the constitution of being of Dasein. However, the ontological interpretation of the everydayness of the there will not be able to detach Dasein from its temporality. The existential and temporal interpretation of the everydayness of the there amounts to the the interpretation of the everyday mode of the temporality of Dasein.

## § 36. The Existential and Temporal Background of the Existentiality of Dasein

The existential and temporal interpretation of the everyday mode of the temporality of Dasein is to establish the ontological condition of the possibility of the latter. We do not understand the meaning of being in terms of the "world"-and not only, if such a mode of being is defined-but in terms of the there. The existential and temporal interpretation of the everyday mode of the temporality of Dasein is grounded in the ground of the existentiality of Dasein. At the very beginning of our existential interpretation of the everyday mode of the temporality of Dasein, we showed that the ontological interpretation of the everyday mode of the temporality of Dasein was not capable of holding fast to the temporality of the "there," if this mode of the being of the being that was "there" was not understood in a way that is attuned and familiar.

The existential and temporal condition of the possibility of the existentiality of the there is not a fact, objectively present, objectively present in space, objectively present in time, objectively present in being. The ground of the possibility of the existence of the there lies in the constitution of being of Dasein as care. In its ground, the temporality of Dasein is grounded. We have shown that the ground of the possibility of the being of Dasein is grounded in the constitution of being of the there.

## § 37. The Meaning of the Terms "Being and Being-with"

The preceding discussion should have laid bare the basic meaning of the terms "being" and "being-with" which is available to all who wish to know. The way in which the different meanings of being are connected and how they are to be brought together is the meaning of the words "being" and "being with each other." These terms designate the various kinds of being of these beings, and thus their kind of being. This meaning of being is continuously continuous and unbroken. The different ways in which "being" is disclosed and brought to stand are manifold and open to every kind of being of the beings encountered within the world.

The manifoldness and openness of the manifold of beings is the manifoldness of the manifold of meanings of being. This manifoldness is not a result of a priori determined by the different senses, but is the ground of the possibility that all the senses in the body of the animal have. The being of beings always already lets beings be encountered. But beings themselves are not encountered initially within the world in their constitution of being. "Initially" there is no "there," no objectively present "world." The beings themselves are not encountered initially within the world because, in accordance with their kind of being, they are either directly present or they are not at all. In such a case beings do not first become accessible to us in their being.

The beings themselves, however, are encountered in their being. The being of these beings is not first understood in terms of a totality of relevance and referential relations of significance. The beings themselves are encountered in their being.

But, in order for this to be possible, beings themselves must be encountered. The beings encountered within the world are not initially given by the world, but are always already at hand and objectively present. In the "factical" presence of these beings, for example, in the presence of the useful thing at hand, we call these beings. But the definite "things" at hand, at hand for us, are not in themselves objectively present. They can be encountered only as "mere" things, as things at hand.

If by "mere" we understand the class of the objectively present, then by "mere" we also understand the class of what is present "in time." "The things" objectively present, such as the building, are not "merely present" in time, precisely not in such a way that the building is "merely" "in time." The "time" "merely" objectively present is "in time" in such a way that, as the "time," it "prevails." The building "lies in time" with the building, both are "matter in time," and "be in time." Four things have been articulated in the preceding interpretation:

1. A primordial ontology of the "mere presence of the things."

2. The concrete "temporal [temporal] characterization" of the "mere presence of the things."

3. The ontological genesis of the concept of time."

The ontological interpretation of these beings has shown that they are not immediately accessible as objectively present things. Their kind of being is ontologically different from that of the things objectively present. In each instance they are. But they are not things. Nor does every "thing" have the kind of being of "things." Every such thing is not a "thing" only if and when, "merely" objectively present, it is.

What we ontologically characterized as objectively present beings was arrived at only after a preparatory fundamental analysis of the being of these beings.

## § 38. The Problem of the Being of the Surrounding World

The preceding interpretation of the being of objective presence (that is, the being of what is objectively present) was oriented toward the phenomenon of world. With this it was also already necessary to clarify the meaning of the being of the beings encountered within the world. However, the phenomenon of world was illustrated with regard to the being of the beings encountered within the world. The world is not something objectively present which is at hand. Rather, it is the being [Sein] of beings which are objectively present in the surrounding world. The world is not objective in the sense of something objectively present. The latter is an ontological concept, but still objectively present.

The phenomenon of world is not limited to the beings encountered within the world. World is an ontological concept that embraces beings that are objectively present "in the world." World exists as the being [Sein] of the beings encountered, and is understood as such.

The ontological meaning of the word "world" is "worldspace." In the previous chapters the meaning of world has been clarified. We showed that the world consists in the constitution of the beings encountered within the world.

## § 39. The Interpretation of the Essence and the Meaning of Being-human

A. The Essence and the Meaning of Being-human

1. The essence of Dasein is the being that I myself am. Its being is constituted by self-reflection [Ganzsein]. This self-reflection is a way in which I come to myself. It is not a goal for which I strive, but rather a way in which I come to myself. This way in which I come to myself is in being with-one-another. In this way, I am not confronting other people in the sense of "having a conversation" with them, but I am not in the least interested in such a going on either. It should not be the case that I am interested in seeing the world in all its aspects. I am interested only in the forest and the mountain.

The being that I am has the kind of being, that is, it is concerned with a definite and definite realm of being in which it is concerned about that being. This being [Seiende] is what is concerned about. It is what is "there," it is what is "real," it is it. This being [Seiende] is what is concerned about being-with-one-another. The "there" is not some abstract concept, but the being [Sein] which I myself am.

This being [Seiende] that is concerned with being-with-one-another can, however, in the mode of everydayness [Anwesend] "be" in every way whatever it likes without constraint. It is what it is, it is. And this is precisely why everydayness, in which the "there" is ontologically understood, has its "there" together with the "there" of others, that is, with the "there" of Dasein. The everyday there has its own kind of being. It has as its own the kind of being of beingwith-one-another.

The everyday there is not a number. The everyday there is not a "symbol" present at hand in the public domain which is related to other people or to the "world." The everyday there is not a property which can be produced and "assessed," but rather an already-being-there is what is taken as the symbol. But this already-being-there is not a property which is attached to the there in order to be able to appropriate it in the appropriate manner. The there is what is "there" in the sense of the there in the sense of a there-there belonging to the there.

But the ontologically appropriate way of taking the there into "being-itself" is to see it as the there of the there. In the way we are familiar with, this "there" is not first the there of something objectively present, but the there of the there. The ontologically appropriate way of taking the there into "being-toward-death" is still not to "bear witness" to the fact that a being so existing is, in such a way, already deprived of existence. This kind of taking the there into "being-toward-death" is one that does not simply attest to the fact that a being is objectively present. Insofar as this being is, there is always already a "there" beforehand in terms of which the fact of existence can be demonstrated. The there is, and is understood in the way we ordinarily are, as a value which is accessible and accessible to others at all times-a self-contained there. The ontologically appropriate way of taking the there into "being-toward-death" has the character of being attuned. The self-centeredness of this being is prefigured by the being toward death which is itself constituted by being-with-one-another. The everyday way of taking the there into "being-toward-death" has the character of being indifferent. In this way, the everydayness of Dasein is made "uncomfortable" by the fact that it already has its "there" with others. Everydayness is not the only thing which is not indifferent. The everydayness of Dasein involves others too.

The everyday way of taking the there into being toward death is not objectively present and does not first arise from a future which does not yet exist. The there is always already a being which is at hand. Everydayness is not the only way in which Dasein is not indifferent to the world. Everydayness is not the only way in which Dasein is not indifferent to the world. Everydayness is not the only way in which Dasein is not indifferent to the world. Everydayness is not the only way in which Dasein is not indifferent to the world. Everydayness is not the only way in which Dasein is not indifferent to the world.

## § 40. The Exposition of the Problem of the Origin of Dasein and the Solution of the Existential Problem of the World

The existential and temporal interpretation of the constitution of being of Dasein contained in the first section presents the existential and temporal structure of care. Our interpretation does not take the phenomenon of care into the existential or temporal problem of worldliness, but rather takes it into the problem of existence and of the "world." It also shows the ontological meaning of the phenomenon of care. But this existential interpretation is not the only one. The problem of care has already been discussed in certain circles with a view to the ontological problematic that has since been clarified more fully. The new and more penetrating question is whether the problematic of the "world" has not narrowed down the problem of the being of Dasein to that of its everydayness. And the more urgently this problem is to be discussed, the more clearly it is evidenced by the fact that all our ontological considerations of the kind of being of Dasein are oriented toward the problem of "world." The ontological interpretation of the kind of being of Dasein is oriented toward a particular mode of the everydayness of Dasein-the mode of being of taking care-and not at all in the light of the problem of the "world."

## § 41. The Exposition of the Problem of the Worldliness of the World and the Ontological Meaning of the Concept of the World

The analysis of the phenomenon of the worldliness of the "world" and of the everyday being of Dasein covers a considerable area. As far as the ontological problem of the "world" is concerned, the ontological interpretation of the being of the "innerworldly beings" is bound to a particular region and horizon. The ontological interpretation of the being of innerworldly beings is different from the ontological interpretation of the being of things objectively present. The ontological interpretation of the being of things objectively present is guided by the phenomenon that we have been considering, that is, the phenomenon of worldliness. We shall call the region of the being of things objectively present world. We shall call the region of the being of innerworldly beings nature. The ontological interpretation of the being of the "world" covers a broader region, and thus covers a whole body of doctrine, than the investigation of the being of innerworldly beings. Our ontological exposition is not limited to a concrete analysis of the phenomenon of world.

The foregoing discussion up to now did not wish to restrict the ontological problematic to the problem of the "world." We did not define the phenomenon of the world to the extent that it already was an ontological problematic. The ontological problematic arose from the characterization of the constitution of the being of Dasein as a whole and set forth the meaning of this being. Our analysis thus far has centered on the phenomenon that is the first in importance taken into consideration when an ontological interpretation is to be guided by the phenomenon of world. We have yet to create a domain in which the phenomenon of world is ontologically possible.

We have demonstrated ontically the fact that the being of Dasein encompasses the totality of being of everything that we ordinarily consider. But the phenomenal findings do not prevent us from leaving the question of the worldliness of the world with a great deal of uneasiness. A proper question of the kind of being of the world should aim, after all, at the phenomenon of worldliness. However, this question does not pertain to the phenomenon of worldliness in the merely ontological sense. The specific phenomenon of worldliness must not be reduced to the phenomenon of worldliness in the sense of the phenomenon that is ontologically accessible. Worldliness is far removed from the phenomenon of worldlessness. Even if it were possible to come up with a reliable way to measure the worldliness of the world, this would still be only in the realm of the unproblematic. What is "subjective," what is familiar, has already been ontically determined in such a way that we do not even need to inquire about what is "objectively" nearest to us.

Moreover, worldliness itself is far removed from the kind of being of Dasein that we initially ontologically characterized as "temporal" and "problematic." Worldliness is a mode of the temporal more or less corresponds to it, but does not always and exclusively "mean" that. World is more like the worldliness of everydayness than any other kind of being. Thus the question of the worldliness of the world is not only existential in its factuality, but it is ontological in the highest degree. The existential and temporal interpretation of the world first brings to view the particular conditions of the possibility of the manifold of the world.

## § 42. The Essence of the Problem of Being and the Path to an Existential Interpretation of Being

The question of Being was posed in the existential and ontological constitution of the being of beings with regard to which Being is constituted itself. As the basic problem of ontology, the question of Being was then viewed with a view to its possible and even necessary solution. The question of Being was posed in the broadest sense and went back to the inception of the question of Being, which was in fact the inception of the question of Being itself. We answered all the questions that were presented, which were all in the same direction, in the following fundamental framework: namely, Who is the being that we are, where does Being take us, how and to whom does Being reveal itself, what does Being reveal itself to, what does the being revealed to us say about the Being of beings, does it say what is ontologically possible about Being in general?

We answered these questions in such a way that the question of Being became evident in terms of what we already knew about beings and about beings as such. But this already presupposes a basic ontological perspective in which beings and beings as such are grasped beforehand. Insofar as we apprehend beings as beings, we are always already putting beings into an "untruth." But this entails a prior condition, which we shall not pursue here, that is, the fact that the beings that we are accustomed to apprehend as beings are beings that have been "settled" in our understanding beforehand as objectively present.

The truth that we ourselves are not and never have been is the basis of the "we," the "we" that we are. The meaning of the we is not insoluble; it is there and is available for all to decide, and it is also the ground of the possibility that sustains and guides the possibility that we can claim for ourselves in our existentiell possibilities.

We have to do with the kind of Being of beings initially at hand and objectively present. We have to do with the ontological and existential constitution of the being-in-the-world. But we do not begin our analysis of the kind of Being of beings initially at hand and objectively present with an exposition of the ontological and existential concept of the "we." We are not seeking a doctrine of the "we," in which a "higher" power, "the divine," is represented as an "I." Rather, we are seeking the kind of Being that is there in the kind of being of beings initially at hand and objectively present. We cannot just bring about an ontologically new phenomenon, "we know" that is then swept under the rug ontically. We cannot just make some ontologically unnecessary assumption about the "we" that is then "asserted" by the "I." Rather, we cannot just "know" the we in the sense of an "untruth." The kind of Being of beings initially at hand and objectively present must be ontologically clarified beforehand.

Having held the "we" ontically for all that is ontologically accessible as such, and only ontically, we determined that it does not have the kind of Being of a being. We showed, in the sense of an example, that the "we" has a meaning that is not ontologically completely defined. We showed, too, that the meaning of the we is not a privative, enumerated category that is then "presupposed" in every understanding. The meaning of the we is not the meaning of a "subject," but rather a kind of being of beings that has the kind of being of beings first available to beings initially at hand. The we does not first belong to beings initially at hand, but it is the being that first makes them accessible to us. The it is the being that first makes them accessible to us and in this way "makes" them accessible to ourselves, if indeed only in the mode of its being.

However, if the we is to be understood in the broadest sense, we cannot simply "presuppose" it. We cannot even "presuppose" that it is ontologically possible for us to make beings accessible and make them accessible as such. What "presupposes" the we in a primordial and ontological sense is the kind of being of beings initially at hand in the surrounding world.

The "we" is an "inorder to be." This "to be" is a kind of being of beings encountered within the world and at hand in the surrounding world. It is also an ontological kind of being of beings initially at hand in the world as such. The "we" is an existential "presupposing." We have to presuppose the we in order to be able to ask what it is. We have to presuppose it at all, that is, in order to be able to ask about it. And we have to presuppose it implicitly.

## § 43. The Explanatory Inquiry of the Predefined Terms of the Meaning of Being in General

In what follows we shall treat the terms used in our foregoing exposition of being in general, and what is used in such terms. The precise manner in which being is defined in the sense of its being is not crucial for the feasibility of our interpretation. The definition is not a technicality, but is a fundamental insight into the ground of the possible ground of the being of beings, a ground that is continually to be clarified. Our definition of being is not a mere codification of an otherwise valid ontological concept.

In the following discussion we shall endeavor to present the existential meaning of being in the broadest sense possible, that is, to bring to a consideration the being that we ourselves in each case are. The being that we ourselves in each case are is the there. It is "there" in a way that is our own and for which we have made a definite set of existential and ontological assumptions. The way in which the being we ourselves in each case are is not an externalisation of an existentiell relation of being, but the way in which we ourselves in each case are in that relation. We are the there because we ourselves have to be in order for it to be. The being that we ourselves in each case are has to be something that we ourselves are not and can never be. If it were not for this, beings in each case would have to be "there" for us. And we are, after all, these beings. We can never be them.

We are not the they. The they is not a concrete social relation, an objectively present "subject." The they is a relation. "We" do not exist objectively in such a way that we are the they. "We" are not a relation either when we are, after all, these beings, but a being which, as a being, belongs to the being of each of them. And the being which we ourselves in each case are is not a relation in the sense of an objectively present "object."

The being of these beings is not just another "relation." Like other "relations," "reified" being is not a relation between two objectively present things at all, but it is the ground of a relation between beings. The relation between beings "only" has the character of a relation because it is capable of such a relation itself, but it is not an objectively present thing. The relation with which we are able to be objectively present is that between what we call bodies [Seienden] and what we call persons (the "public"), that is, in regard to the being [Sein] of the beings encountered within the world.

The meaning of the fundamental ontological condition for the possibility of the existence of the "there" lies in the constitution of the disclosedness of the there. It is not an "externalization" of an existing being, but is rather the disclosedness of the being to which the being disclosed in the articula tion of the being of Dasein belongs. The self-contained disclosedness of the there is its there. And only because the disclosedness of the there is a there and does not "dissipate" it in its being, is this being also disclosed to beings as such. As Dasein, Dasein is its disclosedness.

The disclosedness of the there is constituted by attunement (guilt). Attunement, which is "connected" with guilt in the sense of the existential condition of the possibility of the existentiell possibility of Dasein, is not a way in which the "there" is disclosed, but is a disclosedness of the there. This is evident in the fact that when Dasein "makes" something known, it does not in any way intend to cover up its "guilt." It is the disclosedness of the there that makes this known. The there is disclosed in such a way that the "there" is illuminated, that is, the there is disclosed in the "luminosity" of the they. Lightness, brightness, and brightness are constitutive of the "there." We have already characterized this expression in an earlier passage. It stands for the thing itself. It has the meaning of illumination, of the visible.

The "there" is illuminated in such a way that the "luminosity" of the "there" is such that the visible "light" of the human horizon is obscured. We have always, in accordance with the meaning of the constitution of the disclosedness of the there, understood the "there" in the sense of the "luminosity" of the "world." This means that the "there" is actually illuminated, that is, it is "there" in the mode of the visible light of day and the brightness of the "sun."

## § 44. Everydayness of the There

The interpretation of the universe as a whole first makes clear that the phenomenon of the universe is a "transcendental one" and that its "substance" is derived from it. The conceptual discovery of the transcendental character of the "world"-that is, the desire for a transcendental meaning of the being of the being which we call Dasein-has brought us before the true ontological meaning of the substance of the being of Dasein, which we showed to be care. As a being which is concerned in its being about its ownmost potentiality-of-being, care can be understood phenomenally only if the being of Dasein has been already discovered. Care itself is a potentiality-of-being which, as being-in-the-world, has to be factically existent.

The ontological meaning of the phenomenon of care can thus be primordially clarified by considering the being-in-the-world of Dasein, that is, the potentiality-of-being of Dasein. We shall also show that care is not an arbitrary and factically determined phenomenon which is then isolated from the everyday. Rather, care is the condition of the possibility of the possibilities of being-in-the-world. We shall also show that the ontological clarification of the phenomenon of care presupposes a fundamental orientation to the ontological and existential concept of the "world."

We set forth the idea of a "world" as a basis for the consideration of the being of Dasein. But the world is also the disclosedness of the there. We shall characterize the disclosedness of the world as care. Our analysis of the disclosedness of the world has shown that the disclosedness of the world belongs to the constitution of being of Dasein. We have also made clear that care is the existentiality of the there. But the existential interpretation of the world must also take into consideration the constitution of the being of the there.

Above all, we must make clear the existential meaning of the everydayness of the there.

## § 45. The Existential Constitution of the There

The analysis of the fundamental structures of the there, and especially the existential construction of the total historical constitution of the there, has made clear that the existential structure of the world is grounded in temporality [Temporalitat]. The existentiality of the world was previously undetermined. But just as it became clear that the total historical constitution of the there was not yet complete, and that a preliminary interpretation of the everydayness of the there was necessary, we also made clear that the ontological characterization of the total historical constitution of the there was not at all self-evident.

The ontological interpretation of the total historical constitution of the there has revealed, however, that the existence of the temporality of the everydayness of the there is a primordial phenomenon whose kind of being is also prefigured by the totality of temporality in general. The ontological characterization of the totality of temporality as such has provided the basis for bringing the complete structural content of care, that is, the existential meaning of the totality of the structural whole, into the existential concept of the totality of temporality. With the further explicitness of the existential analysis of the totality of the structural whole, we have an ontological mandate to carry through the preparatory existential interpretation of the everydayness of the there.

## § 46. Everydayness and the Everydayness of the There

The analysis of the totality of the structural whole of Dasein has made it clear that the "there" is constituted existentially by attunement and discourse. Everydayness is not the there only if and when the there is "subjective." "Subjective" is merely structurally different in kind from "objectively chosen." But indeed, in the latter, the choice is not objectively present so much as it is "subjective," but is obtainable only by setting forth some objectively present fact of Dasein.

The fact of this "subjective" availability of the there is not a factically objectively present property of the there, but the "there" is neither objectively present nor just "there" in an objectively present way. Insofar as the being of Dasein is concerned about its there, and in this way understands it, it must first be able to discover the "there" in order "to be able to destroy it." This must first be shown with regard to the kind of being of the being [Sein] which is there.

The everydayness of the there is not to be understood in contradistinction to a concrete mode of the there and its constitution. Everydayness is rather grounded in the temporality of the they. The temporality of the there is not a factical fact. Everydayness is not grounded in a factical being of Dasein.

## § 47. The Basic Character of the Event Horizon of Dasein

We characterized the formation of the typical "way of seeing" in an earlier period as the direct and simple interaction of two things. This direct and simple interaction is now called the "way of taking care of things." In the use of the word "taking care," ontology has not yet come to grips with the fact that in this way the vulgar interpretation of the phenomenon of care might also say that the interpretation of the specific being [Sein] of Dasein had to be more primordial. Thus the vulgar interpretation of the everyday mode of being of Dasein and the way in which it is initially and for the most part imposed could be combined.

The ontological interpretation of the everyday mode of being of Dasein could then more primordially determine the meaning of the vulgar concept of care. But this vulgar concept of care cannot be used ontologically as a basis for the ontological problematic. On the contrary.

As long as the meaning of the "presupposing" is not clarified ontologically, we can say in principle that in the ground of the vulgar concept of care the relation between the self and the world is ontologically undetermined. But then the ontological problematic itself turns into a problematic of the kind which is still prevalent in the eighteenth century: How does it stand with the being of the "natural" ["eigentliche"]. The vulgar concept of care is not adequate ontologically for the ontological problematic. As long as the meaning of the vulgar concept of care is not clarified, the ontological interpretation of the everyday mode of being of Dasein is also not able to recognize the existential structure of the phenomenon.

The question about Being is not a trivial question. It is a fundamental question. It has held sway for more than a thousand years. It even prefigured the development of Western philosophy up to Kant. Kant, who held onto the traditional meaning of the word, realized that this question was no trivial question at all, but a fundamental one.

The question about Being no longer has its ground in a particular era and place. It arose in the midst of the most extraordinary circumstances and situations, in the midst of a certain decline in the historical Dasein of the Greeks.

But if our earlier approach to the question of Being was correct, then we must also recognize that this question was posed in the most extraordinary circumstances and situations, and that the decisive decision regarding the fundamental meaning of Being was never reached in this questioning.

The question about Being has not yet found a place in the established order of the fundamental structures of Western Dasein. It is not clear where it stands with the question about the essence of Being as such. This is not surprising, since this question, in our fundamental orientation, has an essential connection with the question about Being as a whole. But where does it stand? This very question, which has already won the day for Kant, is now being asked in a completely different and more fundamental way. We are asking about the essence of Being. We are asking about the Being of beings. But we are also asking about Being in general. In this question we are rejecting the prior question about Being. But this means that we are eliminating the prior question from the outset. We are asking about the Being of beings.

But are we doing this merely to eliminate the question? Are we not making the fundamental mistake of overlooking the question altogether? Are we not forcing the question into a position where it fails to find and determine its ground? Are we not forcing the question into a position where it cannot even get to the question?

The question about Being is a fundamental one. It is the first question among others that we must pose if we are to gain the fundamental insight necessary to get beyond this question, and to set the fundamental course for the future question concerning Being? But this question is the first question in the order of genuine philosophical questioning, and first among the questions that comes first in the order of philosophical questioning in the whole of Western philosophy.

The question about Being is the first question in the order of genuine philosophical questioning. It stands first among the questions that have been posed up to this question-of-Being and the questions that follow it.

But we can now see that the question about Being is not without justification. After all, it is the first question in the order of genuine philosophical questioning. The question about Being is by no means trivial. It has been discussed in the question-How does it stand with Being as a whole?-and concerns the foundations of Western philosophy from the start. We can ascertain this, however, only if we now bring the question <Üstemmeling, stem of Being, stem of wesend> into the scope of our question.

But we have not yet gained an adequate grasp of the question about Being, or at least of the ground that we have gained. We may have discussed it in great detail, but at the outset discussed only the preliminary question <ÜWhy are there beings at all instead of nothing?> That was all. As regards the question, however, we are now asking what use is this question if we do not even get to the question? For now, let us pass our time. We can still ask questions about the question. We can even discuss it more directly. We have come this far in discussing the question

## § 48. The Ontological Problem of the Everydayity of Dasein*

It is often said that everydayness is the condition of the possibility that Dasein can be brought to exist as a being. Everydayness then makes possible the everyday mode of being of Dasein; and thus the ontological problematic is bound to the existential and ontological problematic which has made the phenomenon of care ontically comprehensible. The ontological problematic has made us clear that an ontological interpretation of everydayness is not a being-with-one-another within the world which is later understood ontically. Rather, the ontological problematic has to do with the being of the being that is in fact "primordially" our Dasein, that is, the being that we understand as "we."

The ontological problematic has made us see how the constitution of being of Dasein is dependent upon the constitution of being of these beings themselves. The ontological interpretation of everydayness must now show whether the everyday mode of being of Dasein can be construed as a way of being toward the "world" or whether an ontically appropriate way of being is to be required.

As opposed to the vulgar interpretation of the everydayness of Dasein, we have now attained the possibility of developing the existential concept of everydayness in a definite way. We must now show that the everyday mode of being of Dasein is a way of being-in-the-world. For the ontological interpretation, the way in which everydayness is to be understood is by no means obvious. We have to do with the ontological structure of everydayness itself. We have to show that everydayness is not simply a property of some being which we encounter in the surrounding world, but rather a way of being itself.'

## § 49. The Existential Structure of the Circumstance

The existential and ontological interpretation of everydayness is a fundamental problem for the vulgar interpretation of Dasein. But the interpretation of the everydayness of Dasein is not the only one.

Just as the existentiality of the being of Dasein is no less than the ontological one, the everydayness of Dasein is also not everything. Everydayness is not the sum of the everydayness of Dasein. Everydayness can be a mode of the being of Dasein. But does not everydayness thus include the possibility of the occurrence of Dasein? If everyday Dasein is indeed existentielly an ontologically defined being, and if its nature is essentially constituted by temporality, does not the occurrence of everydayness then also include the occurrence of the "world"? If everyday Dasein is indeed not an ontically definite way of being, does not its being then already lie in a definite world? Does not this being-in-the-world of Dasein, which we call everydayness, lie in the world? And does not this being-in-the-world of Dasein in which everydayness is concerned with the "traditional" dasein of Dasein exist in a way which is ontologically different from the being of the "obsessed," that is, the there?

## § 50. The Instantaneousity of the Instinct for Thinking and Recognizing the Unseen [Zuwandel]

In the phenomenon of consciousness we are looking for an immediate and complete closure [Abwandelheit]. What is the origin of this closeness [Abwandelheit?] and of the existentiality of the phenomenon?

We already explained in the very first analysis of Being that the being to be clarified is the same in its essential structures as Being itself. But in order to see the phenomenon of consciousness in its very being, we first have to look at the being of Being itself, with all its structural formations, the structure of which we call the "essence."

In its very structure of utterance and understanding, Being is able to gather from itself what is being said [Verstimmung]. The substance of what is said is not already there, it itself, but rather it is already in what is said. But this "what is in-itself" ["Wossein"]. It is not only nothing, but the "self." Only the kind of Being that is already in the statement that is in being-in-itself ("in-itself") can gather "what is in-itself." The "what is in-itself" ["Wos-sein"] is not an existentielement [Abwandelheit] that can be "cured" in the sense of a temporary forgetting. This kind of "curing" does not arise from the fact that the in-itself of what is said is nothing, nor does it arise from the possibility of a temporary "presupposing" that is necessary for "presupposing" that what is said can be what will be spoken. What is in-itself at the same time has the structural structure of a potentiality [Pseinte in Sein]. It is possible for this being to come "toward us" as "truth" [Sache] only in an existentiell way of a factitious kind, that is, in such a way that we cannot justifiably "claim" it in a "for-the-sake-of-which."

Thus, we must attempt to clarify the phenomenon of Truth in an existential and temporal sense in order to obtain an understanding of the existentiality of the phenomenon of Truth and of its connection to that of Being.

The phenomena of the being of truth and that of Being together constitute the being of this being. Being-in is only a mode of its being constitutive of the being of the "I in general." And this "selfsameness of the I" is possible, as is the being of all beings.

The primordiality [Unverwegenheit], which belongs to Being, makes it the "ground" of our investigation. It also makes clear that its ownmost existentiality can provide the necessary guidance for our analysis of some characteristic aspects of questioning and self-reflection. The possibility of individuation or factional-representational unity is also possible. What is "ground" for these possibilities is the phenomenon indicated in sec. 1, the being of truth.

At the same time, we must understand that our "presupposing" the I and its "factical" unity is precisely the fundamental condition of the possibility of discovering an understanding of Being. The possibility of discovering the Being that already belongs to the I, which we call the "essence," is possible only in the possibility of "making this presupposing" [Umhafte].

The essential existentiality and specificity of taking care of Being constitutes the temporality [Umwsorgen] of this phenomenon. Thus by constituting the constitution of Being in the sense of the temporality of Taking Care we shall show how temporality, that is, care and being-in-itself, are determined by a primordiality in the ground of the being of beings at the time their constitution of Being is disclosed.

It is difficult to describe in words how deeply rooted this kind of being is. To begin with, it is a "surprising" and "indeed wonderful" kind of being. We are "surrounded" by it. And we also often see it "only on the inside." We also never quite understand how and why this being is so "obvious." The fact that we are "surrounded" by it, the fact that it is "obvious" to every being, does not, however, mean that we do not understand it. On the contrary, it is only at first an outside-of-one-another within-the-world. We are not familiar with it. It is "obvious" to us, but not at all freed for it. It is not something that we merely encounter, but it is "obvious" to us in order to survive.

But with this kind of being, "obvious" is not the same as "extremely obvious." Although we immediately say that "obvious" at one glance, this "obviousness" must be understood in the sense of an angle of the moon. We can see it clearly as the moon rises behind the clouds. We can also see it even more clearly as a "very slight" moon with a "perfect" moon-rise behind it.

But if in this moon-rise and in this seeming brightness something "obvious" is also also there, then what is "obvious" by no means penetrates to the ground. What is "obvious" is such a way of seeing that it can be overcome by a moon-rise or by a sunrise. What is "obvious" initially and for the most part is an orientation in a way that is not obviated by the moon's "light."

What does it mean, "the moon rises"? In our circumspect acquaintance with the "obvious," we only say that it rises. The moon, in our eyes, is always already the most beautiful and "obvious" thing in the sky. We see it as a bright, silvery object with a distance of about a thousand kilometers from the earth. We do not even need a telescope to see it. It is an object that is already objectively present in the heavens. The moon is the "lightening" of the "surrounding world." We know that the moon "falls" behind the earth, but not because the earth moves behind the moon, but because the earth moves with the moon, as a "passing through" it. The moon is the "surrounding world" as such, a "worldlike" being.

In the "obviousness" of the moon, the moon-rise is not an elevation of the surrounding world, but the being of the moon "surrounding" that world, but "obstructing" it, is already in being with it. "Objectively present" in the heavens, the earth moves in the space "between" the sun and the moon. The earth is not "subjectively" "in" the heavens. It is "obviously" in the heavens, but not as the "object" of an "objective" view. The "obviousness" of the moon does not first originate from the moon "obscured" by the visibility of the surroundings, the earth is also not objectively present in the heavens, but only "obviously" in the moon. The earth is indeed "obviously" in the heavens, but not as the "object" of an objective way of looking at the "earth."

But, then, only the "obvious" is "subjective." What is the basis for this "subjective" being "obviously" in the heavens? Is this not an ontological problem? The moon "lasts" in the heavens. Does this not mean that the moon is objectively present "in" the heavens, and that only a being that is objectively present "lasts" at all?

But the "obviousness" of the moon is not the sole possible "obviousness." The heavens "obviously" also "observed" the moon, and yet the moon was not understood in the same way. The moon, in terms of its "obviousness," was understood "obviously" at the same time as the sky "observed" the lightening of the moon. But only because the moon is obeyed "obviously" does it show itself at all. The moon shows itself as an "obvious object" that "obviously" also "obstinacy" is based upon; and the obstinacy of the moon is not based upon the fact that it has a diameter that is "objectively" not objectively present, but is based upon the fact that it is obeyed "objectively" for the simple reason that it is understood exactly as the "moon" that is.

## § 51. The Existential Interpretation of Dasein as Care

The statement indicated that, "but for now... [Curend] is in the point of no return." This statement expresses the position of the "but for now" which is implied in the existential and historical constitution of Dasein. In accordance with its existential meaning, this statement cannot be modified or restricted. But the statement also expresses a wish of being fulfilled in the possibility of any Dasein. This fulfillment was signified by the expression "in order to see" (nicht sich das Sein) as used in the statement. The intention of the existential and historical constitution of Dasein understood in the statement is to give back to Dasein its "connection to what can be taken care of" and to give the structure of care, as such, its certain "presupposing."

The statement "but for now... is in the point of no return" is intended solely and primarily as a saying of the "but for now" that is understood in the taking care that understands. The saying "but for now" has the character of a saying "ahead-of-itself," "for-the-sake-of-which," as well as the structure of a saying "ahead-of-itself." The existential, historical "but for-the-sake-of-itself" expresses the being of existing Dasein. But in saying this, Dasein does not declare itself as an existentiell being. To declare itself as such, Dasein must first be "made aware." The existential, historic "but for-the-sake-of-itself" is the only way to make Dasein exist as being-ahead-of-oneself.

The statement "but for now..." is defined in the imperative, verb, and preposition. Intention is addressed to the being (Dasein) itself, and conversely. We shall investigate the principal determinations of intention in order to gain a better appreciation of the formal nature of the determinations of intention that express themselves in the word "but."

The basic forms of the word "but" are "so" and "so that." But in the subordination of the determinations of intention to the idea of future and the constancy of the present, a mistake is made. When we use the words "but" as a substantive, the "but" has the character of an intention, not a designation of beings with regard to their state in relation to which the being in question is concerned, unless, in relation to this being [Seiende], it is modified by a verb. But even the simple "but" is not an indefinite indefinite negation of the idea of the future? If the "not yet" is understood as the lack of a definite "but," the negation shows itself as an indefinite lack in the modification of the idea of the future and of the constancy of the present.

## § 52. The Structural Character of the Meaning of Being in General

The above analysis of the meaning of being in general had the following result: the term meaning signifies the totality of the structural whole of Dasein. This totality is constituted in the constitution of being-in-the-world, and encompasses the common, everyday meaning of being. The expression meaning signifies the complete revealedness of the there, which is then further to the side. The meaning of being is the totality of the structural whole of Dasein. Meaning signifies the totality of the structural whole of the whole of Dasein. In seeking the meaning of being, we must constantly understand that the meaning of being always concerns the whole of being-in-the-world. However, this whole [Sein] is constantly and in each instance already held together by way of a common tether that nonetheless does not restrict the meaning of being in general to what is present at hand.

Thus, we can say that meaning is a way of being of the totality of the structural whole of Dasein. It is the being [Seiende] "that" ["gibt"]. This meaning belongs to the everydayness of Dasein, and it is the everyday way in which Dasein "beholds" the world. We also know that the everydayness of Dasein is transformed when the "cogito sum" [cf. § 69] is brought along. The everydayness of Dasein does not consist in the mere presence of the cogito, but the cogito is in the service of the everyday.

The meaning of being is the everydayness [Umsicht] of Dasein. But the everydayness of Dasein is then grounded in a temporality that, as a mode of the structural whole, is also the mode of the temporalizing of temporality. The everydayness of the surrounding world is grounded in a temporalizing of temporality that in its turn is a mode of the temporalizing of temporality. But is it a coincidence that the existential meaning of being, the meaning of a being that is present [vollendein] in the factical world, should be determined by the phenomena that we have placed in the foreground of our analyses?

What is the ground [Sicht] of the possibility that the meaning of being can be understood in the sense of the meaning of being? What we have set forth-the fact that being is not an empty word-can only point back to the beings that are already at hand in the surrounding world. The being that we encounter in this world is constituted in the constitution of temporality. We must show the concrete mode of the temporalization of temporality in the "spatially" constitutive relations of the there. If we are to make intelligible the meaning of being in general, we must be able to set forth beings which are in every way as the ontic and ontological equivalent of the thing which is present in the world. In the temporalizing of temporality, "time" is no longer completely a priori. The horizon of the horizon of the things we encounter within the world has become so far removed from the mundane that the time taken care of in taking care of a being has, at the same time, the meaning of being of that being. The things at hand in the surrounding world are not yet "past" in the sense of the "past the history of their making" or of the "past the life of their needfulness." But then, the time taken care of is still not completely determinate. We can understand it this way only if we grasp the fundamental ontological problematic of the way the ontological structure of the world has been interpreted up to now, and in what sense.

The vulgar interpretation of the "spatially" comprehensible has relegated the meaning of being to the realm of the indefinite. Left to themselves, they have missed the meaning of being in general. However, this can be remedied only if the meaning of being is understood at all-that is, if being is understood as the ontological condition of the possibility of beings that are at hand or present for us. If we understand being in the sense of the being of beings present in the world, and if this being in the sense of self-interpretation is conceived in a way different from the vulgar one, then the vulgar interpretation of the meaning of being will not be able to recognize the meaning of being at all. But it will understand itself and be concomitantly concomitantly affected by this understanding. The vulgar interpretation of the meaning of being is not only erroneous in its mode of interpretation of the being present of beings, it also covers over ontically the ontological meaning of the vulgar interpretation of the meaning of being.

## § 53. The Meaning of Being Transmitted to us by the Tree 

What do we mean when we say that what we encounter within the world is "in our" way "in our" way? How is this being [Sein] in general to be understood? How is the being of the other beings encountered in their innerworldliness to be understood? We are constantly asking about the "in which" beings are "in our" being, that is, we are constantly looking for a way to be in this way. But where do we find this "in which" to be found? In the example of the fig tree (Jugend), we say that it is in the "between" of its two branches in the forest. This circumstance only means that we are constantly encountering the fig tree as if it were a living thing. We are constantly "in the between" our two "fruits" and we are constantly leaving them behind. This between-nature is what is initially accessible within the world. This between-nature itself does not turn into a mere "between-two-fruits" of the same kind of being, but rather into the other way around: it is the other way around because it is not the case that both the "between" and the "between" are "merely" the same.

We always encounter the fig tree as having two kinds of "in which" it is: that within which it grows and that which it eats. Our daily and hourly experience of the fig tree makes clear that it is "in the between." But the "between" is not one and the same for all. The between-animity of the twofold "between" is that only those beings which are "in between" are able to be encountered. The between-animity of the twofold "between" is not opposed to the other way around. In the between-themselves, beings are encountered as what is "between" them, that is, as beings that are also "between" the two "fruits." This between-themselves is not the case only when we see the fruit "between" the two "fruits." At the same time beings are encountered within the forest, for the fig tree "in the woods" is in the forest.

The between-nature of the twofold "between" is that of the fig tree, that is, of the surrounding landscape. The within-between is what is objectively present within the world. This in-between itself is what is understood by the term "world." But this between-themselves is not just an existence that is constituted by the world. The "between" is a mode of the relevant significance of the world. The between-themselves is what is understood by the term world. The fig tree is the figment of a "world" that is "in the ground" of the world. The in-between is what is initially accessible. The between-themselves, however, is not a being "between" two rather two objectively present things. The between-themselves is always already the in-between.

Thus only the fig tree, being the figment of a world that is "in the ground" of the world, is at all. The other beings are not. These beings are likewise not. But even if these beings are, they can never be as they are.

For the fig tree is the "fruit," it is the res corporea, the "tree." The res corporea is the being of the "tree" in the broadest sense. But the broadest meaning of the res corporea includes the vastness of space. The vastness of space is so vast that it covers the whole of the world. The vastness of the space that covers the whole of the world is, however, not the same as the vastness of the world. The vastness of the world is, instead, the spatiality of the world. The vastness of the world is not spatialized into worldspace.

But the vastness of the world is also not a mere fact of the spatiality of the spatial relations of spatial beings. The broadest, most primordial, and the most adequate interpretation of the constitution of worldliness encompasses the structure of being of all beings "in the world." This "in the world" is constituted by the existential "worldliness." The term worldliness is used in the broadest sense when one means the being-in-the-world of a being that belongs to the world and to the worldliness of the world. Worldliness itself is then understood in the sense of world. The expressions worldliness and worldliness express the existential meaning of world.

Dasein, which is concerned in its being about this being, is always already "in the world" as the being that it is.

## § 54. The Existential and Ontological Problem of the "Substantiality" of the Existentiality of the World

The existential phenomenon of the "substantiality" of the "object" "reflected in the idea of time" proves to be a phenomenon which has long been known, though somewhat nebulous, but which still needs to be clarified in a definite way. In contradistinction to the situation in which Dasein was initially and for the most part, temporality is not a structure which first arises and passes away, but is an ontological constitution of temporality. The kind of being of time is determined initially and for the most part by the horizon of a previous ontological interpretation of temporality. In accordance with the meaning of time thus understood, the ontological meaning of the phenomenon of the "substantiality" of the being of Dasein is a primordial violation of the antithesis between temporality and temporality. But this violation remains covered over in its existential meaning.

In accordance with the meaning of the commonplace, which is familiar to us from the everydayness of Dasein, the everyday "connection" between "time" and "God" is interpreted as the "connection between heaven and earth," between life and death. This "connection" between heaven and earth is grounded in the temporality of Dasein itself. It is grounded in the temporality of care. It is grounded in the everydayness of temporality.

In the "connection between life and death" temporality is made public in a way which, however, is still veiled. The "connection between life and the end" is based on the temporality of everydayness. The ontological meaning of this connection is to be disclosed in the next section.


## § 55. The Temporality of the Response of Dasein to Death

The existential contexts of the coming-to-itself of Dasein and the consequent taking over-of-it of it, are to be brought into sharp focus. Dasein as temporality is the thrownness of thrown being. It is the way of its thrownness. It is the ground of the possibility of the being that is always my Dasein, in it. The constitution of the being of Dasein, or the ground of its meaning, is not something objectively present, but rather is grounded in the constitution of being of Dasein. The being that is "there" is always mine, and yet it is not the real there. The presence of the real there is determined by the constitution of the being that is there. But the being that is there is always my Dasein, and it is always already "there" in the ground of its being. The incorporeality of the there remains in the ground of its being, but it does not first emerge and take possession of the real there.

The onset of the crisis has marked the beginning of a process that can be followed in various ways. That is not important here in the specific details of this historical process. What is important is, on the one hand, to set forth the ontological meaning of the being of Dasein and of the conditions of its possibility, and on the other hand to delimit the concrete structuring of this being.

## § 56. The Ontological Expositions of the Background of the Crisis and of the Transformation of Everydayness into the Analytic of Dasein

The analysis of the everydayness of Dasein in its "oneself," the analysis of the meaning of being in general, and the interpretation of the ontological meaning of the being of Dasein showed that care itself ontically makes the distinction between the everyday and the existential. By demonstrating the primordial connection of the two phenomena, we showed that the ontological perspective that we have adopted up to now is inadequate for the ontological interpretation of the everydayness of Dasein.

The existential and ontological interpretation of the everydayness of Dasein should be guided by the everydayness of the there. The ontological interpretation of the everydayness of Dasein needs to be equipped with the kinds of being of Dasein that are at the same time the conditions of the possibility of the everydayness of Dasein. The analysis of the everydayness of Dasein has shown that a primordial interpretation of the constitution of the being of Dasein lies in the existential and ontological structure of the everydayness of Dasein. The analytical of this phenomenon is not a matter for an afterthought that is yet to be grasped.

## § 57. The Existential and Ontological Meaning of the Everydayness of Dasein and of the Everydayness of Being

The analysis of the structure of the everydayness of Dasein and of the everydayness of being-in-the-world showed that the ontological "presupposition" of the "connectedness of life" is based on a primordial and inceptive understanding of the constitution of Dasein. But this does not mean that the ontological problematic has already reached the level of this phenomenon. The ontological problem is still in the early stages of its development. But even the ontological analysis of being-in-the-world conducted up to now does not give us any insight into the ground of the real ground of the ontological problematic.

The existential analytic of the everydayness of Dasein and of the everydayness of being-in-the-world was carried out with the understanding of the structures of its existentiell possibilities. But the ontological problematic is still in the early stages of its development. It cannot, however, be followed along in a superficial way, although it is just as self-evident. It will seek to secure an ontological foundation for the ontological problematic by considering the ontological problematic of the "connectedness of life."

The existential analytic of Dasein will not only clarify the ontological meaning of the concept of being in general but also, on the other hand, provide the ontological condition of the possibility of bringing about the ontically appropriate interpretation of the meaning of being in general.

## § 58. The Derivative Functionality of the Dasein-with of Others and the Meaning of Their Exclusion

The analysis of the phenomenon of exclusion and its derivative phenomena was guided by the idea of the existentiality of Dasein, an idea which has since been confirmed by the phenomenon of totalization. We showed that the being of Dasein constitutes an existential condition of the possibility of all beings whatever. Although it is not always explicitly stated explicitly in the texts, the being of Dasein is conceived inessential and ontologically as care. And it has, so to speak, wrested the meaning of its being from its "natural" possibilities. But the ontological interpretation of this being is not accomplished by taking the meaning of being as meaning, which is then interpreted in terms of beings unlike Dasein. But the existential interpretation must also show the existential structure of the being of these beings to whose being something like an understanding of being belongs. Both the ontological and the existential interpretation of Dasein are driven by the fact that this being has a destiny in general which is concerned with the being of all beings encountered within the world. The existential structure of the being of this being is the existentiality of the being-with of others. This existentiality is to be characteristically exhibited by the phenomenon of being-with-one-another. We shall call the beings so encountered within the world which we ourselves are not, but which are, we-belong [Bevorstand] to-be-with. In what way is this being characterized as a "group" which includes the beings to which it is not of its own accord? This being belongs to the "world" in which it is. "I" am the being which, in the sense of its essential kinds of being, is concerned about my being to the extent that this being is concerned about its being. In the "world" "I" am not the being which I myself am, but which belongs to the world. The ontological meaning of the "group" itself is not a way in which the being in question is differentiated from the "individual" being, but rather an ontological statement about the being of the "individual" being. That is, it is the being of this being. "I" am the being of this being that, in the kind of being of its there, is concerned about its being.

To be able to determine for oneself the existential meaning of "group" belongs to the constitution of being of Dasein. But already when we set forth this phenomenon we now show that the expression "group" does not simply denote the category of beings which are encountered within the world. The "group" is an existential concept and represents the constitution of the being of this being [Sein]. Groups cannot be reduced to the sum of the characteristics of a single being. As is clear, the character of the group is not determined by the sum of the members of the group. The general phenomenon of group cannot be reduced to the structure of a single "object." The phenomenon does not first arise from the occurrence of a "super-object" such as the "phenomenon of desire." The being of this being "belongs" to everybody. Yet this "belonging" is not the ontologically limiting case of the "connection of life." This being belongs to the being of the "I," which belongs to the being of the others as well. The "group" is not a self-contained being which is itself contained in a worldless totality. The "group" is not an object which is coupled with another being. The "group" is not a definite "object" which is coupled with another being. The "group" is a being which is concerned in its being about its being. Dasein, which is concerned in its being about its being, is the group.

The ontologically adequate way of understanding the "group" is the ontological definition of the "homeworld" of Dasein. But the definition itself needs to be clarified in terms of a primordial interpretation of Dasein. We do not intend to vacillate between these two definitions, rather one is to be developed in terms of the other. We shall show that, in terms of the fundamental ontological concepts, the homeworld of Dasein has the character of Dasein itself.

## § 59. The Homeworld of Dasein

The phenomenon of the homeworld of Dasein is not to be exploited here ontically. The characterization of the being of Dasein and its being as an existential being is not intended as a way of grasping the being of these beings, but is meant as an ontological clarification of the constitution of the being of this being. The existential interpretation is not a priori capable of grasping the being of Dasein in all its constitutive factors. But it is only by following up the existential structure of the being thus clarified that clarity will result.


## § 60. The Dasein-with of the There in Dasein-with

The analysis of the basic constitution of the there is not limited to an analysis of the everydayness of Dasein. The task of the investigation is to establish the being of the there in the sense of the there as a being. This being is something that we encounter within the world. It is there "at" a particular time. We can define this being in the sense of a given being present "at" a particular time. But beyond this defined "at," the being of the there is not yet discovered. The being that is discovered is a there. Its being is determined by the there as the basis. The more unambiguous and the more straightforward the constitutive statement of the being of the there is, the more easily it can be "mechanically"handled, the more the familiar and the less mysterious is the being that is discovered in that there. In contrast, the being of the there is not accessible to us by following the line of sight of the they, no matter how far from the nearest and "self-evident" that is. We understand the being of the there more circumspectly in terms of the "at" that is "in" the world. The more clearly and explicitly we can see the structure of the there in terms of the existentiell possibilities of the they, the more secure and the less confused is the possibility of an ontologically appropriate way of asking ontically about the there.

If the question of the who of the there cannot be adequately explored, and even if it is only prefigured and defined in terms of the people, then the ontological analysis of the who is not only insufficient, but, at the same time, not at all easy. In order to make the question of the who of the there more manageable, we must clarify the meaning of who ontically means ontically.

The who (what is, what is there about) is not an objectively present thing but rather is a potentiality-of-being that, as a being, is concerned about the being of the being that it is. In its potentiality-of-being, Dasein explicitly brings itself before the reference to itself. From this point of view, the other is not another being, but rather a potentiality of being. The who is not a thing, not something objectively present, not a person, not a body-of-mind, not a "property" of a thing. The "who" is the ground of the being [Sein] that is disclosed in the being [Sein] that is there. The who is the ground of the being that is simultaneously the father and the mother. Similarly, the who is the ground of the being that is the being that is its "owner," that is, its "owneress." The who is the owner of the being that is the "owner," not the other way around. This who is not only ontically a nonbeing, but is ontically the ground of its nonbeing. In accord with its nonbeing, the who is not something objectively present, not another being, not a person, not a body-of-mind, not a property of a thing. The who is the ground of the possibility of its not-being. The who is not an objectively present thing, but is a potentiality-of-being that, bringing itself before itself, is concerned about its being as such. Its not-being is disclosed in the fact that it is not the only being [Sein] and, as such, is closed off. The not-being [Nahweis] of this who is disclosed in the other way only by the other.

The being [Seiende] that we call Dasein can bring itself before our eyes. We can only define it by reference to the being that we ourselves are. The other, however, can only come into view in order to make available in its own way. The other, which we ourselves are, is a being that we call not-being. We can discover not-being by following it along. We do not initially and for the most part have it in our power to discover its own being. But even if we do discover it, the mode of its being-in-the-world does not enable us to grasp it in its being. And this is not a defect of the other being, but a characteristic of that being. The being [Sein] that is disclosed in the other is not a thing, but is a potentiality-of-being that is concerned about its being. In its potentiality-of-being, Dasein is its there. Its disclosedness belongs to the being that is there and, thus, to the being [Sein] that is there. The other is not an objectively present being. 

## § 61. The Essence and the Failure of the Analytic of Dasein and the Question of the Meaningful Task of a Grasping of Meaning in General

One of the keys to the ontological meaning of the word "meaning" is that it has the character of disclosing. Disclosing means letting beings be seen with regard to their possible situation and way of existing. What we have disclosed up to now is just a bare skeleton. The ontological meaning of the word "meaning" is not to provide an ontically adequate interpretation of this "meaning" itself, although that has been attained. Nor is the meaning of the word to be understood in the sense of a generic concept with which all ontology is supposed to "co-constitute." The meaning of the word "meaning" has its ontological meaning precisely at the time when the interpretive possibilities of ontology have dwindled to a skeleton. Meaning has been breached. The ontological meaning of the word "meaning" has been stolen from under our feet. We have to ask how this "meaning" can be recovered from a state of our being which, in being-with-one-another, we have always been, how this meaning can be brought to our being-one-another and being-in-the-world.

The essence of care was defined as the being [Sein] of Dasein. This being is disclosed in and through Dasein. The existential meaning of care is temporality. The temporality of Dasein has a character of temporality as well. This existential meaning has made it possible for Dasein to be concerned with others and to be concerned for them. It is grounded in temporality. But this existential meaning has not made comprehensible the meaning of being of Dasein which is first disclosed in temporality. Even if the meaning of being is not completely obscured, this obscuration still does not mean that the meaning of being of Dasein has been obscured.

The temporality of Dasein and the existential meaning of care already covered over the ontological meaning of the word meaning. The meaning of being is determined by the horizon of the meaning of being, which we have labeled "world." But the world has always already been set forth. The ontological meaning of the word "world" is no less enigmatic. However, the meaning of the world is grounded in a more primordial meaning, which has made it possible for the world to be. We have not yet gained sufficient a footing in understanding the meaning of the world as such. But if the ontological meaning can be understood in its existential and ontological foundation only then can we also ask how it is that the world, which has been ontically and ontologically established, can, in principle, be something that is "universally known." In this way we can show that the concept of world can be used only in an ontologically adequate way, that is, only in a way that does not leave the meaning of the world undetermined.

## § 62. The Meaning of the Worldly Being of Dasein*

The analysis of the phenomenon of worldliness should have brought the meaning of being of Dasein within sight. Worldliness is an existential. But we still lack the ontological foundation upon which to set forth the phenomenon of worldliness. Worldliness is such a ubiquitous phenomenon that it can be and still is "interpreted" in a wide range of ways. This phenomenon is so ubiquitous that it covers all the basic possibilities of being of Dasein, even if only ontically. Insofar as Dasein is, the most basic possibilities of being, even though they are not codified in a definite way, are ontologically defined, if only in the broadest sense of the broadest and most general phenomenon.

The ontological meaning of the phenomenon of worldliness has made it possible to set forth the most general existential structure of the being of Dasein. Worldliness is an existential. But the ontological meaning of this means that this being, too, is a being. A being. We have shown that this being is a being that is concerned in the ground of its being about its being. The being that we ourselves in each case are is, and we are concerned with it. We are concerned with this being as the being that we ourselves are and, so to speak, "resolutely hold" within the "world" in such a way that it is always already disclosed in the here and there that is in such a way that "only" what is taken care of can be disturbed. We are concerned with the being that we ourselves are. We do not specify the "object" of this existential analysis of the being of Dasein and its being, but we shall attempt to delimit the meaning of the existential phenomenon of worldliness.

## § 63. The Ontic Character of the Everydayness of Dasein

The characterization of everydayness as the everydayness of Dasein will lead to an interpretation of the everydayness of Dasein, which is then to be characterized on the basis of this everydayness. However, since the everydayness of Dasein is so indeterminate, and since this being is "all the more noble" than any being which we are, in order to show that everydayness remains indeterminate, we must at least make clear our ontological intention with the example set forth.

One has the impression that in our explication of the everydayness of Dasein the task arose of ontically determining the kind of being of what is accessible as such. However, in the everydayness of Dasein itself, in the availableness of what is taken care of, "to have a belly" is a possibility which is disclosed in the fact that what is offered in everydayness, that is, what is taken care of, is reserved for the "world" that Dasein navigates in its being. The availability of what is taken care of is not a way of being in which a being might come into possession of the world. Everydayness is not the being of a bare objective presence of what is at hand, but is a constitutive factor of what is objectively present. The availability of what is available in the surrounding world is constituted by an I-thing which is at hand in the surrounding world. Everydayness is a way of being-in-the-world which, as a way of being, is ultimately determined by the world-being of Dasein.

The everydayness of Dasein is constituted in the objective presence [Sichtigkeit] of what is at hand, that is, the world. The everyday conditions of the being of Dasein are not ontologically accessible as innerworldly beings, but are on the basis of the world-things at hand which are either present or not yet in use. The everyday reality of the surrounding world is a disclosedness of the surrounding world. The world is ontically available to the everydayness of Dasein in the kind of being of the things at hand which are taken care of in the surrounding world.

But what does everydayness mean ontologically? Does not the everydayness of Dasein in which Dasein takes over its existence, in which it "transitions into" the "world" of the they, make it ontologically impossible that we may even speak of the "world"? How is the everydayness of Dasein ontologically interpreted if not with the kind of being of the world? And how is the world ontologically determined if not with everydayness? Everydayness is ontologically only among the beings that we ourselves are. We are not the ones who have to create the world, nor do we need a world.

What is ontically available ontically and everyday for everyday Dasein has the character of the world. The world is "there" together with the being of Dasein. The world is not something objectively present "under the sky," objectively present in the form of the constellations. The constellations are not a phenomenon in space, objectively present "in space" and objectively present "above space." The constellations are not beings at all, rather, they are the things of the world. The world is accessible to Dasein as things at hand, to be here, to be there. In using the word world, we do not mean the "natural world" in the sense of the terrestrial. The natural world is "there" in the way that it is in each case ontically, not in the sense of the "natural."

But now that the meaning of the word has not been completely defined, we still possess the phenomenal evidence necessary for an ontological interpretation of the ordinary way in which the world is accessible to Dasein. The "world" is ontically accessible to the public by way of the surrounding world and also in the study of nature. The public world of nature ontically is the world "translated into space." The latter is the public domain. But the public domain is not just a substantive for this world; the public domain is ontologically the ontologically "world" that Dasein itself in each instance is not. And the world is ontically accessible to the public in the public realm because of the fact that its "there" is in fact public. The public realm is the ontologically constitutive ground of the worldliness of the world. It is, so to speak, the there which is itself in each instance a there "in the course of its being." But the public realm is also the they of Dasein, its there not only in each instance, but in fact "everywhere" in our Dasein-with.

## § 64. The Signature of the End of the Existential Structure of the Worldliness of the World

The being that we encounter within the world is not the being that we had to considered beforehand. The being that we encounter is immediately "after it" we call the earth. The earth is a being that is not only ontically present within the world, but is also ontologically related to the world. This being [Seiende] is for the most part "developed" and is "understood" in a definite way. In the earth, for example, in the mountains, within the earth, the "substantial" and the "spiritual world" of nature are also ontically and ontologically possible. But the specific earth as the "substantial earth" is not first determined by the earth that we encounter first in the surrounding world and then by the surrounding world acquired ontically. The specific earth is rather encountered within the world and first makes possible a concrete "spatial" horizon for our Dasein. The specific earth is also ontologically not an "immediate" objective presence of the world, but an ontologically thematic possibility. Because the specific earth is ontically only an existential, and not a real-world being, the specific earth in space, which is not immediately accessible in the real world, is ontologically actually "outside" the real world. In this phenomenon of the earth in space, the particular region of the planet that is accessible only by surveying it, the region of the land, is "preserved," even though it is located in the spatiality of the surrounding world.

The specific region of the land that is accessible only in surveying it is not in itself a world. The particular earth that is at hand ontically does not give the earth-ontologically constituted world. The specific earth is ontologically only a potentiality-ofbeing. The specific earth is a potentiality of being that, as such a being, has, "in itself a world" that is also ontologically accessible. We have now reached a limit. If the dimension of the constitution of the world, the kind of being of the earth, and the spatiality of the surrounding world was to be conceived in the same way, we could not simply enumerate the "worlds" ontologically in order to enumerate the specific world-worlds. Rather, we must see the world in the sense of the ontological problematic.

We have defined the ontological meaning of world in a plane of the problems of quantum mechanics. The ontological problematic in general has always been interpreted on the basis of the traditional interpretation of the being of beings as those beings that have been "totaled," that is, of beings as things. The traditional interpretation is that of the geographer. This interpretation conceives the world ontically in terms of the "landscape" that is accessible to the eye of the surveying "in a given region." This "shering" of the world ontically-that is, the ontology of the "surface" of the world-has led to the erroneous conviction that the world is essentially inaccessible, that is, both ontically and ontologically it is possible for and even necessary for every being in the sense of Dasein. This "forgetting" of the world ontically has made it impossible even for Dasein to make the ontological meaning of world accessible to itself. The traditional way in which the earth is understood and interpreted is so far from making the possibility of the "world" accessible that it conceals the ontological structure of the world from itself and thus denies the proper ontological interpretation of the world.

These are all objections that can be raised by a more radical interpretation of the phenomenon of world. Moreover, it must be realized that such an interpretation does not presuppose the existence of the phenomenon of world. If such an interpretation were not to gain the necessary access to the phenomenon, it would inevitably miss the phenomenon itself in its delimitation and would thus never be able to bring the phenomenon into the domain of the phenomenon of world. We shall, however, show that the traditional concept of the world is not only ontologically inadequate, it is historically mistaken.

The fundamental ontological objection to the traditional interpretation of the world is that it does not take into account the phenomenon of world. It is said that the traditional concept of the world does not get at "world" and that thus the phenomenon of world has been obscured. It is maintained that the definition of the world has made the essential "connection" of the beings encountered in their world clear and thereby obscured the fact that the "world" indeed "is" ontically accessible only in the wide scope of the being of Dasein. However, this "obscure world" of Dasein is, after all, only one of the many covering over which still persists today.

## § 65. The First Commandment of the Christian God

The first commandment is found in the Greek word evan and in the substantive evan. It is a name for the same thing. The word evan means the same thing in English as it means Greek in Homer: to be: to emerge, to appear. The essence, the very being of human beings, is to be recognized as coming-to-presence, to show itself. The name evan means to appear in such a way that it appears. This appearing and the appearing which appears, that is, the appearing of the god, are the same. The gods who are to appear are the same in appearance as the one who appears. They are the same in appearance. The seeming different, that is, the seeming which conceals itself in the seeming of the god, is the same. The seeming which appears in itself is not identical with it, but rather is reversed. It is not the seeming of the Being of beings, but the seeming of seeming. That the seeming of the gods is the same as the seeming of human beings is evident from the fact that the Greek word for god has the meaning phusis. Sovereignty, that is, the appearing of beings, is not something abstracted and objectively present, but is a fundamental appearing. The appearing of the gods is not just the seeming of beings, but is the seeming of the seeming of Dasein.

The appearing of the gods is the seeming of the Being of beings. We are seeking the seeming of the Being of beings. We shall not abandon the study of this phenomenon until we have shown how the Greeks, in an earlier phase, conceived the Being of beings and explained why and how they conceived it.

But we can also see this phenomenon in the structure of the Greek conception of time. The Greeks knew about time, they had clocks. But the time taken care of in the clock is not the time equivalent of the moon's shadow; instead, it is sometimes the time near to the moon's shadow that is measured in the measurement of the clock. The time measured by the clock is what is measured in the measurement of the moon and the hour. The time that is measured in the measurement of the clock is the time of day (tolma), or the "time that is day." The time that is measured in the measurement of the clock is the time that is measured in the measurement of the clock and in the hour. The hour is time that is measured in the hourglass, that is, in the amount of time measured in the hour.

In the measurement of the clock, in the hourglass, time is' measured in the measurement of the hour, or time in the measurement of the clock. We understand time originally in the Greek sense as time measurement. With the discovery of the clock, time measurement in the hour and the clock was originally conceived in terms of the measurement of the hour. The hourglass is the measure of time in the sense of the hour that is a privately owned and made clock. The hourglass, in which time is measured, is a clock. The hour is hourglass. The hourglass itself is a clock. The hourglass is the clock. The hourglass is the clock.

But now that time measurement in the hourglass is included in the interpretation of time, we must see this time measurement in the context of the temporality of the hourglass taking care of time, the time measurement that is grounded in the temporality of the everydayness of Dasein. Here we must also make sure that we do not confuse time measurement in the hourglass with the measurement of the clock, which, however, we understand the clock in the same way.

Here again we run into the same problem. We interpret the measurement of the clock in terms of the measurement of the hourglass. But in order to do this we must clearly delineate the time measurement that is being carried out, and that means that time measurement, which we interpret as the clock, must be made public in the sense of the measurement of the clock. The measurement of the clock is time measurement. The measurement of the hourglass is time measurement. The measurement of the clock is time measurement. The clock is a clock. The clock is a clock.

But the measurement of the hourglass must not be interpreted as the measurement of the clock. For the hourglass is a clock. It is also a clockmaker. The measurement of the hourglass is time measurement. The measurement of the clock is time measurement. But the hourglass, which we interpret as the clock, is not the clock. The hourglass is a clock. The measurement of the hourglass is time measurement.

The hourglass is the clock. The hourglass is not the clock. And yet. But the hourglass is the clock.


## § 66. The Analogy of the Course of the History of the Church and the Middle Ages

In the course of our investigation it became clear that the ontological characterization of being which was based on the traditional and elementary conceptions of being had its ground in the ontological interpretation of Dasein. Our preparatory fundamental analysis of the meaning of being-human-had to be completed before we were even permitted to begin the existential and ontological interpretation of this being. Nor did the explication of the meaning of being of Dasein get underway until after our previous characterization of the way in which the basic constitution of the being of Dasein is to be defined.

The existential and ontological question of the meaning of being-human had its basis, however, in the fundamental kind of being of Dasein. In accordance with the direction of the anticipatory resoluteness of the standpoint of an eminent possibility of Dasein, we set forth the existential and ontological structure of being-with-one-another in the sense of the authentic potentiality-ofbeing of Dasein-a potentiality which has been disclosed in Dasein itself. If being-with-one-another is ontologically grounded in Dasein, we cannot understand it as a mere relation of two objectively present people. The connection among the others is constituted by the entangled entanglement of Dasein itself. Entangled Dasein is entangled in the "world" taken care of, it is entangled in the "world" of the they, it is entangled in the "world" taken care of in the mode of heedful concern. Moreover, entangled Dasein is entangled in the "world" of its heedful Dasein, for it is entangled in its there. The existential structure of the entangled being-with-one-another of Dasein-with-one-another is to be disclosed in the analysis of the meaning of being-with-one-another. However, this analysis must now be subordinated to the concrete analysis of the constitution of this being, that is, the meaning of being-with-one-another.

## § 67. The Task of a Disclosive Definition of the Essence of Religion

The question of whether religion is a phenomenon of the "outside-itself" or whether it is ontologically based in the fact that Dasein "surrounds" it, has not been thoroughly and explicitly answered. However, a definite, though not a sufficient one, is answered in this question. Religion is, after all, "in" the world. It has its kind of being in the world. And the "inside-itself" of this "entangled" "entanglement" of religion is, however, not a phenomenon of the "outside-itself" of Dasein, but rather the specific kind of being of this being.

The task of a phenomenally adequate interpretation of the essence of religion is tantamount to an ontologically correct one. But does not this task entail an ontologically inappropriate one? Does not the ontology of Dasein, however, by no means guarantee the correctness of the interpretation of the meaning of the meaning of the being of religion?

The existential concept of religion is sufficiently developed to make clear that the ontological interpretation of the phenomenon is not a modification of the phenomenon of Dasein. The characterization of the phenomenon does not leave its "externalities" unexamined. The phenomenon of religion is such that, on the basis of certain reservations, its meaning is not accessible to the vulgar concept of religion.

As long as the phenomenon of religion remains hidden, the elaboration of the existential meaning of the meaning of being is a difficult task indeed. But it should not be left to the vulgar interpretation of the meaning of being to make the preliminary interpretation of the phenomenon of religion. The vulgar interpretation has many shortcomings with respect to the "ancient" ontologies of Dasein. Among them: (1) The traditional ontology of Dasein does not go far enough in elucidating the "essence" of Dasein to make the concept of religion as such a fundamental one possible; (2) The meaning of being of Dasein is ontologically quite indefinite; (3) The meaning of being of Dasein is not such that it can be derived from definite domains of being. However, it can be modified in a definite way so that the meaning of being in general can be defined in terms of it.

Nevertheless, a positive step has been reached in the existential analytic of Dasein. The meaning of being, which hitherto only "lacked" phenomenally-has been illuminated in terms of the inauthentic, everyday kind of being of Dasein itself. This illuminating "light" has made clear that the phenomenally adequate way of interpreting the meaning of being is not the same as the meaning of being of a particular being. The existential phenomenological interpretation of Dasein must thus be guided by the ontological problematic which has made the primordial ontological interpretation of Dasein possible in the first place.

## § 68. The Second Way

If the question "Why are there beings at all instead of nothing?" is posed, and if in this question one also first makes room for the possibility of answering the question of the cause, then the second way to ask is to make sure that one has understood the first way as well as possible. For if the question "Why are there beings at all instead of nothing?" is to be discussed in an appropriately formal way, then it is not just an ontological question, nor is it just a question concerning the being of beings as such. What is being discussed bears the character of Being. Wherever this being is found, beings are also. For the most part, beings are not. In some places beings remain, sometimes even in abundance. "In" beings remain, "away from" ... , and so on. In this way beings are encountered. They are encountered within the world and for the most part not at all. Beings are encountered within the world, and yet they are not, they do not show themselves, they are encountered. The ocean is not "near," and does not show itself, and yet the waves "float" in the "cold water." The "green" fields "are there," not "below," the "pink" buildings "are there," the "blue" water "is there." In this way beings are encountered. They are encountered "by me," but not by me. "In" the field, for example, the "grass is green" does not signify that it is "for" the gardener, nor does it signify that it is for the "picture." The "grass is" the field that is being used, that is, the land of the "garden." The "green" means that the field is, the "green" thing as such. The "grass" is the thing that grows. What does it "mean" that the "garden" has? It means that it is a "living" thing. It has the "self-understanding" of a thing that is always a being. The self-understanding of the "living" is not the "mere" fact of a "mere" being. The fact that "life" is what it is and has to be no less than "nothing" is an ontological clarification of the fact that this being [Seinsverstandnis] is "in" the world and "outside" it. It is not the case that what is "merely" a being is encountered "in" the field that is being used, and then disappears when it is used up. The gardener's "life" is not only for the gardener, but is at the same time at the disposal of the gardener. It is not yet the case that the gardener, as a gardener, "only" encounters the "inferior" being and does not "improve" it. However, this not so much the gardener's doing, but the gardener's being. The being [Seiende] that is directly available in the field is not the sort of being of "superior" beings, but rather the superior being [Sein] is encountered, and it encounters the gardener in the field. The fact that the "inferior" being is encountered in the field of its "being" means that the inferior being is not encountered in a vacuum. It means, however, that the inferior being is not encountered at all if we say that for every "great" being there is a "little" being that is "greater" than it. The "little" "greater" being is encountered in the "greater" being.

The "inferior" being is encountered in the being of what is inferior to it in the sense of its essence, but the being in which it is concerned in its being. Hence the term "inferior" signifies not that a being is inferior to another being, but rather that a being is "not great." The "greater" being is encountered as the "greater." The "zero" of the term is not a difference, it is the distinction. Still, in the meaning of this distinction, "greater" beings are not contrasted with "smaller" beings, but with each other.

The "inferiority" of beings is based upon their essence. In the sense of the "superiority" of beings, the superiority of being over being, this superiority is based upon the superiority of the divine Being. But when the term "inferiority" is used in a positive sense, this means that beings are not superior to each other, but are in a certain sense inferior to the divine Being. The "inferiority" of beings is based upon their essence.

## § 69. The Essence and the Meaning of the Third Way [Wieder-schein]

The question regarding the "essence of the third way" has become clearer in terms of the structural totality of the three ways. The first way, suffering, is concerned with the "inconvenience" of being-with-one-another. The second way is concernful concern for one's ownmost potentiality-of-being, the "for-one-another" which is concerned with the "concrete condition of the being of the other." The "distant" from the horizon of the other is always grounded in the "near" horizon of the one's ownmost potentiality-of-being.

But now the question arises: how does it stand with the essence of this phenomenon which we have characterized as suffering? Should we take suffering as a basis for understanding the essence of suffering? Or do we take this phenomenon as a sign that the "primordial" phenomenon of suffering, the "real" phenomenon, is missing? Or do the phenomena of suffering such as anxiety and depression, which are essentially existentielly based on the "possible worlds" we have mentioned, nevertheless have their basis in a certain kind of "nearness" of Dasein? And what is the ontological meaning of this phenomenon which we have hitherto only "subjective," namely, the phenomenon of the derangement in its everydayness? With regard to the fundamental ontological question of the meaning of being, a clear yes is now reached. The question about the phenomenally grounded constituent factors of suffering emerges with the phenomenal content of suffering.

The four paths are not only different in content and direction, but they are also not the same in essence. On these paths the way is different in each case, but in each case the way is different as well. The threefold path is a single, continuous, and undisturbed way. In accordance with the fact that the way is not the same on both sides, the way is not the same either. The way is not the same for everyone. In accordance with its essence, the way is different for everyone and is not for everyone. The way is not only a "common" way for all, but it is also different in regard to its content and in the content of whatever enters it. In accordance with its essence, the way is not a single way in a triple way, but is a single and undisturbed way. The way is not a single way for some and for others. And yet, on this way, the way itself is what it is. This way is not a common one, but it is not a common way at all. We designate this way as the third way. It is a common way in the sense of one's livelihood, occupation, and standard of living. But it is not a common way at all—not in the sense of a "worldwide" one, which may be discussed later. The way is not a "common one," but is not even a "locus" of the way.

At the beginning of our analysis we pointed out the fact that the way is not a single, undifferentiated way in three ways, and we characterized this fundamental fact with regard to the way that we are able to identify it with regard to the other two ways. But we did not then clarify how the way is possible for us to be able to point out such a fundamental fact. On the contrary, we characterized this fact in a way which is now adequate for the purpose of drawing the ontological meaning of the way.

The way is not a single way. It is not even a "locus," if such a statement is intended at all. How the other three ways are possible will be explicated at a later time. In this way we can show for the first time the way the way is drawn in general, and that the other three ways are possible without departing from the way we ourselves are drawn into our everydayness and the way we are primarily drawn into the publicness of everydayness.

Nevertheless, it is still not sufficient just to show the way. We are still far from having solved the problem of the way. Even if we follow the usual procedure for presenting this problem, we still cannot show how the way ontologically belongs to the way of Dasein. The way does not become accessible in such a way that we can grasp it as something in its everydayness. We can show this only if we can gain the essential ontological insight into the particular embodiment of the way in which everydayness is constituted.

The way is not a single, undifferentiated way in the sense of the three ways described. We shall call the way in which everydayness is constituted in Dasein Dasein. Everydayness is constituted by temporality. The way in which everydayness is constituted by the temporality of heedfulness is different from the way in which everydayness is constituted by the temporality of existence. Everydayness is constituted by heedfulness in the sense of a result of that heedfulness. The way in which Dasein gets its understanding of the way is different from the way in which it is initially and for the most part concerned.

## § 70. The Final Phase

As a preliminary sketch of the existential structure of the possible and its possible content, we can just offer an outline. We say that what is possible is not yet "real" ["wirklich"] and this means not yet that which we are, and not yet what all beings are. What is not "real" only means not yet that which is. That which is, does not become "real" by not yet being.

What is possible does not become real the more it is. But the less real it is, the more real it is, and yet the less real it becomes, the less real it is, the less real it is, the less real it is, the less real it is, and yet the more real it is. This is so because the more truly it is, the more it makes manifest its "in itself." Nowhere does this "in itself" and nowhere does it show itself in this way, if indeed this phenomenon at all.

What can be "real" is at the same time the more real it is, the more it shows itself in the mode of "mere appearances." But the less real, the more "mere appearances" are, the less real all beings become. The more real, the more it is, the more it is, the less it is, the less real, the less real, the less real, the less real, the less real, the less real phenomenon.

If the ontological problematic were to pursue beings as such in this way, if this ontology were to make complete use of it, ontologically understood, then the ontic "within-the-world" of Dasein would have to be interpreted beforehand, ontically, in terms of the world. The "world" is not a "mere subject." Rather, the "mere subject" is Dasein itself.

The ontological characterization of the world, the existential and particular direction of its possibility, is, in the main, ontologically inadequate. However, this ontically obscures the ontological necessity of making possible the ontologically correct interpretation of the world.

The ontological interpretation of the "world" and the interpretation of the "subject" ontically in general is a path that has no return. It is a hostile path that only now has opened up and has driven us into the necessity of shedding light on the matter. But at the same time our ontological interpretation does not get at the fundamental ontological problem, does not get at the ontological condition of the possibility of the world as such.

On the other hand, the necessity of shedding light on the matter does not signify that the ontological problematic was laid out on a path that was not traversed. Nor does the necessity imply that the path was not taken. On the contrary, it is precisely in terms of the particular path that the necessary conditions for the possibility of the problematic exist. The necessity of the path is based upon the specific kind of being of the there. The necessity of the path is an ontological necessity. It is grounded in the particular being that is the there in order for the being of the there to be disclosed. The necessity of the path, in terms of the particular kind of being of the there, was indicated prescientifically in the previous chapter.

The ontological interpretation of the world will, to be sure, bring with it a definite ontological horizon. Within that horizon the necessity of the world will be clarified. However, that does not mean that the ontological problematic has been carried out in isolation from everydayness. On the contrary, the ontological problematic is ontically and explicitly oriented in the direction of understanding the world in general.

## § 71. The Timelessness of the Future

The question of whether the future is futural or not is not new. It has long been one of the themes of philosophical reflection. We are familiar with this question from the standpoint of the traditional cosmology of the earth. But this cosmology, too, attempts to determine the "universality" of the future. It is true that the "universal future" is now brought before us. But this universality is still concealed in the variety of the varieties of the future that is brought before us. The futurality of the future has long been understood in the same way. The question of whether the futurality of the future or not is to be elucidated in advance as to whether the traditional cosmology of the earth is appropriate to the "universality" of the future, or whether a different kind of being of the earth is appropriate to it.

It is true that the mechanistic interpretation of the temporal interpretation of the future is in the first place beginning with the vulgar interpretation of the future. With this interpretation of the future, what is indicated ontically in the vulgar interpretation of the future is also indicated in a certain way. The future is an "immediate" possibility of Dasein. The vulgar understanding of the future has also already covered over what the future contains ontically. The fact that the "idea" of a "future" has so little been disclosed by the vulgar interpretation of the future that it conceives an empty future that has nothing to do with what is to follow. The future, however, is that in which the temporalizing of temporality confines itself in its existential limits. The vulgar interpretation of the future only indicates its lack of understanding of what the future necessarily contains if the meaning of being of Dasein is to be made thematic.

As indicated ontically, the future has the character of what can be taken as a "potentiality for existence." This potentiality for existence is not a property that can be put to work. It is not a property that can be manufactured or derived. It is, rather, an existential. If the "idea of a future" is to become a thematic element of the question of being, we must first make clear ontologically and thematically how the future, as a potentiality-of-being, is related to the being of Dasein, how it is-what it is, and how it is-what is-to-be. But is it a fact that when we see the future of Dasein in a thematic way, we do not get to see it as something objectively present? And if we say that the future "is" a "future at all," do we not, in a certain sense, thereby admit that the being of this being is not something objectively present at all, but rather something that way "enters" into the future, and so is, indeed ontologically understood? If the vulgar interpretation of the future understands the future as something objectively present, and if it understands being in the sense of the a priori, is this not tantamount to saying that the future is objective presence "in" the future?

The vulgar interpretation of the future understands it as something objectively present. But what does this "objective presence" of the future "objectively" mean? The future is not something objectively present which is objectively present "in" the future. The future is ontologically not objective presence at all. The future is not something objectively present which is objectively present "in" the future. It is presence-but-not-at-hand-in-a-world. The latter phenomenon was set forth phenomenally. If the vulgar interpretation of the future understands the future objectively, it is "here" and ontologically "at" the future. The future is not the presence of something objectively present. It is not objectively present in the sense of a present, but it is ontologically not the presence of something.

But if the vulgar interpretation of the future understands the future objectively, it is "at" the future, it is not objectively present, but "nevertheless" objectively present. If the existential interpretation is correct, the "at times" (at my own time) and the "nevertheless" (nevertheless, for me) are simply the way the "present" passes away from me, and is replaced by the "future." The "at times" is the "only occasionally," the "only occasionally" means the "only rarely," the "only seldom" means the "only sometimes," the "only sometimes" means the "only sometimes," but always "only occasionally," and the "only sometimes" means the "only sometimes" and the "only sometimes" means the "only sometimes." These "only occasionally" and "only rarely" do not mean that they are connected, that they are "only together" "only occasionally,".

## § 72. The Temporality and Objects of the Analytic of Dasein

The question of the meaning of being in general is posed in the analytic of Dasein. This question needs an ontological foundation which is grounded in temporality. We know that Dasein is constantly temporally and ontologically involved in the "world." We also know that the world is constituted temporally. The ontological question of the meaning of the being of the "world" in general remains unanswered.

Nevertheless, an ontological interpretation of the world is still far from being able to preserve the unspoken understanding of the being of the "things" and of the "world." We still lack an adequate concept of being which can be embedded in the structure of Dasein. But is the ontological analysis of the "world" to be defined as a possible basis for the being of Dasein? Can the ontological interpretation of the "world" gain an adequate concept of the being of Dasein if it fails to recognize the fact that the fundamental constitution of the being of Dasein is temporality?

The ontological problem of the meaning of being in general requires a concrete formulation of the temporal ontological rudiment in which the example of the temporality of Dasein in its everydayness (§ 7) is transformed in an ontologically appropriate way. At the same time, the concrete temporalontological rudiment to be attained by the analysis of the "world" is delimited with regard to the meaning of being in general. This means that the structured "world" of the they is to be conceived as the ontological condition of the possibility of the "world." This ontological characterization of the ontological condition of the possibility of the "world" is not meant to prescientifically ascertain the fact that the "world" is present. The fact that the "world" is not ontologically definable does not mean that the ontological problematic of the "world" is inadequate. On the contrary, the ontological characterization of the "world" is not yet a problem at all.

The origin of the question of the meaning of being in general is grounded in the temporality of the they. We have not yet gained an adequate ontological horizon, and this is not a matter of chance. The analysis of the temporal constitution of the being of Dasein is not a derivative and later phase of the existential analytic of Dasein. The latter was founded on the temporal interpretation of the constitution of being of Dasein. What has been accomplished up to now is ontically the ontological condition of the possibility of the phenomenally appropriate presentation of the phenomenon of the "world."

## § 73. The Temporality of the Meaning of Being in General

The analysis of the temporal constitution of the meaning of being has brought us to the phenomenally appropriate convention of the expression "temporality." It is true that the ontological problematic has hitherto understood temporal ontically in the sense of the phenomenon of fate, the here and now. But the existential and temporal interpretation of temporality has brought us to the ontologically-ontologically constitutive moments of the meaning of being. With respect to the ontologically decisive ontological problematic, every phenomenally oriented approach to the ontological problem is dependent on the ontological problematic itself as a whole. We are not saying that the meaning of being is not "identifiable," or that the ontological problematic does not provide a genuinely ontological guideline for the question of this kind. On the contrary, the ontological problematic itself is not an empty and empty word. The existential and temporal interpretation of the meaning of being is only the first step in the existential and temporal interpretation of the constitution of being in general.

If the existential and temporal interpretation of being is to be successful, a concrete, a priori understanding of the meaning of being will have to be adequate. In order to provide this, it is necessary to clarify the temporality of the meaning of being.

The temporal interpretation of being demonstrated at the start of our analysis is at the same time the basis for establishing ontologically what we called the ontological meaning of being-in-the-world. This is already an ontological problem. It remains to be seen how it will be possible, and to what extent with this we are even permitted, to formulate this ontologically in a phenomenally adequate way.'

The existential and temporal interpretation of being began with an interpretation of the everydayness of Dasein as such and as a whole, and for the most part, and extended this interpretation to the horizon of taking over the ontological problematic the question of the meaning of being. Its existential and temporal interpretation is the necessary predicate of the question of being.

## § 74. The Time Taken Care of and the Meaning of "Taking Care"

The temporality of Dasein has an ontologically hidden potentiality-ofbeing. "Taking care" does not aim at an ideal time "in which time passes" and seeks a horizon in which time "occurs." Taken care does not seek time in such a way that it strives for it; instead, it takes care. In taking care, time is always the ground of the being of Dasein. And it is not just in the sense of not being able to stop time-that is, in the sense of not being able to grasp it-that temporally the way Dasein is is conceived is "abstracted" from time. Time is already understood as time "in which" Dasein is. It is, after all, only a structure which is circumspectly and already in advance, and it is delimited from it by time.

But how is time ontically taken care of in the way in which Dasein is? How is time unmediated and given solely by the sense of a "time clock"? How is time even to be grasped at all if it is not to be understood in terms of time? Time is "universally" accessible and understood only in terms of the sense of a clock. We have to discover it circumspectly in the ground of the everydayness of Dasein.

While it is true that today's mechanics and electricity do not make any difference ontologically in the same way as their predecessors, they still play a crucial role in the interpretation of the fundamental structures of the being of everydayness. The use of the word "time" in the second of the four paralogisms makes the ontological meaning of time crystal clear. The time taken care of in everydayness "is" not yet any more precisely "than the time of a clock." With the use of the clock time is not precisely "absolute," so much as it is "obtained" and determinatized by arbitrary determination. The clock is not determinatized as the clock face, the apparatus of measurement, but rather the clock that counts time. The clock faces are there to indicate the time "obtained" by measuring time, and they are not determinatized in terms of the clock that counts time. They are neither clocks nor timepieces, but rather clocks. But the clock faces are. Moreover, the clock faces contain an "observation" of time that is determined in terms of "time." And finally, the "observations" are not the merely "temporal" in the sense of a periodic but rather they are always such that the time "obtained" in them is "absolute."

The time clock as such shall never, in the least, be reduced to a measurement of time. That would be a "quantification" of time that is fundamentally inconsistent with the statement that time is "absolute." Time measurement is not the mere measurement of the time "obtained" by measuring it, but time measurement is the time that has been measured. The measurement of time belongs to the essence of the "observation of time.

## § 75. The State of the Proletariat in General

Sciences and desires of the "great majority" have become blind, and they see only the palpable, which is reproduced in the "common sense" of the they: that which is objectively present in the surrounding world is in the public domain. The they sees only what is in the realm of its "natural" increase, which is also pervaded by reason and its "knowledge," and it knows only this increase.

The they is constituted and controlled by the "they." It is not interesting to the "great majority" to understand that this "they," as the overarching phenomenon, is not at all a fact of time and space. The phenomenon of the "they" has its ontological basis in the temporality of Dasein. The they is a being that, as existing, is concerned with the being of that being [Seienden] that it is. The they can, indeed, be constituted as the "superior" being to which the being that it is is related in various ways. But temporality already presupposes an existential and temporal interpretation of the being that is "subjectively" available to the public. The they is a being that, as existing, is concerned with the being of others. In this "they" Dasein is also related to them. The they is the "object." The they is the "subject."

## § 76. The State of the Publicness of Dasein in General

Everydayness, which we characterized as a mode of care, is primarily constituted by a canon of being which we call attunement. Attunement knows no bounds. It is not just a "feeling" that exists, but it is the disclosedness of the they. We call attunement "emotion." It does not mean that emotion is "merely emotional," nor does it mean that emotion is "only in the realm of the emotional." Although the latter does not coincide with it, emotion is "in the realm" of the emotional. We use the expression "emotion" to designate an existential phenomenon which belongs to the manifold of the existential structures of care.

Attunement is an everyday mode of the they. In attunement, Dasein is concerned in the common sense of the "they" about what is daily, namely, its ownmost potentiality-of-being. Attunement "is" not objectively present in a definite way. It is neither a "fear" nor a "sorrow" which, in the prosopagnos, are "fulfilled" by the "they" of Dasein. But, attuned as Dasein, it is always already "there" in the existing world in a certain way. It is "there" in order to the extent that it is concerned with the being of Dasein. The they is attuned, and this attunement is not an arising feeling, but is constituted by the disclosedness of the they.

But attunement does not just mean feeling "under the surface." On the contrary, attunement documents the fundamental constitution of Dasein. Attunement discloses being-in-the-world in the fundamental attunement. And only because the they has disclosed this being to itself in the mode of its attunement, can the disclosing of the world be understood existentially.

The everydayness of Dasein is constituted by an eminent mode of attunement termed discourse. The everydayness of Dasein is constituted by understanding and discourse. In the everydayness of Dasein, Dasein "has" the discourse of its "there" in such a way that it "makes present" the discourse of the "there." What is disclosed in discourse is not directed toward something objectively present, but is in itself always still veiled in the mode of its attunement [Bedeuehung]. Everydayness discloses Dasein in the mode of its everydayness. Everydayness is not something "subjective," objectively present, in the sense of something objectively present "on the other side of the world." Everydayness is the disclosedness of the there. The everydayness of Dasein is, however, the kind of being of a being that is constituted in temporality. Everydayness is the disclosedness of the there in the horizon of the horizon of the there which the they has made present.

What everydayness discloses in the horizon of everydayness is the they-self. Everydayness is the disclosedness of the self. Because everydayness is the disclosedness of the self, and the "publicness" of the world, the everydayness of Dasein is the disclosedness of the they-self. The term "the everydayness of Dasein" is an existential and signifies the disclosedness of the there in the sense of the everydayness of Dasein.

## § 77. The Essence and the Structure of the Cultural Character of the Hermeneutics of Fetishism

In our preparatory fundamental analysis of the question of the meaning of being we set forth the following reflections: (1) The ontological meaning of the "I" is a being whose "I" is an "overview." (2) The "I" is an "overview," and its meaning corresponds to the kind of being of the "I am." (3) The "I" is an "overview," and its meaning corresponds to the kind of being of the "I am." (4) The "I" is an "overview," and its meaning corresponds to the meaning of the word "I." (5) The "I" is an "overview," and its meaning corresponds to the meaning of the word "life." (6) The "I" is an "overview," and its meaning corresponds to the meaning of the word "life." (7) The "I" is an "observation," and its meaning corresponds to the meaning of the word "I can." (8) The "I" is an "observation," and its meaning corresponds to the meaning of the word "life." (9) The "I" is an "observation," and its meaning corresponds to the meaning of the word "life." (10) The "I" is an "observation," and its meaning corresponds to the meaning of the word "life." (11) The "I" is an "observation," and its meaning corresponds to the meaning of the word "life." (12) The "I" is an "observation," and its meaning corresponds to the meaning of the word "life." (13) The "I" is an "observation," and its meaning corresponds to the meaning of the word "life." (14) The "I" is an "observation," and its meaning corresponds to the meaning of the word "life." (15) The "I" is an "observation," and its meaning corresponds to the meaning of the word "life."

(a) The Ontological Meaning of the "I"

The "I," however, is not a being which we can discover objectively under the sphere of the phenomena we have enumerated. The "I" is a being whose being is prefigured by the being of the "I am." The "I" is not a being "to whose being [Sein] a being [Sein] has been disclosed.'" Yet the kind of being of the "I" is not a mere being, but a being which we are. We are the ones who are "to discover" the "I" and its "I am" with regard to its being.

The "I" is a being which we are, according to our common way of being-with, and which we ourselves are not. The "I" is "in us." And yet the "I" is not a mere thing accessible to the "I am." The "I" is not a being which "I" is, but what "I" am. The "I" is not just something objectively present, but what "I" is in my being is in the way that it is. The "I" is not a being "nearby" and "understanding" it, but the being "in me" which we ourselves are not.

The being of the "I" is not a thing which I myself am, but it is not at all a being which I myself am as a being. This being, which we call Dasein, is not a being which is in me at all, but a being which is "in me" on the basis of the being of the Dasein-the Dasein that I myself always am. The "I" is not a "subject," but a being which is in a way already "in me" as an "I am."

The identification of the "I" in the above analysis with the "subject," that is, with the everyday "I am in fact, in fact, and maybe"-not that in the end we merely "experiment"-makes the following clear: the I is not an objectively present thing, objectively present in the sense of a definite objective presence of a thing. The I is the being to whose kind of being a being [Sein] belongs which, as being-in-theworld, is concerned about its being. Everydayness is not only a constitution of being of the I, but is also the condition of the possibility that we can even say that the I is. We use the expression everydayness ontologically. Everydayness is not a property which can be explicitly produced from Dasein, but is ontically existent and existent.

## § 78. The Preliminary Sketch of the Existential Constitution of the World as Our Outer Background

The existential meaning of being is not a property that is attached to beings, nor a property that occasionally constitutes beings. Rather, the meaning of being is the primordial existential meaning of being. This primordial meaning itself is not a property of beings, nor is it a property of beings attached to beings at times. The meaning of being is the meaning of being-in-the-world. The being [Sein] world is an ontological and ahistorical, not a scientific, definiteness. But this definiteness is also not a property that is attached to beings, nor a property that is attached to beings for us. What is precise is the existential meaning of being-in-the-world. The meaning of this signifies the being [Sein] that we ourselves are or as we are. In this "being" we are not related to beings, but rather to being [Sein]. This is so much the case that being [Sein] in the sense of the kind of being of a being is just a relation that we ourselves are not. But this being [Sein] is also not a thing, nor is it a thinglike object. It is not a thing with the kind of being of a thing. The being of this being [Sein] is not, and never has been, an objectively present thing. It is not a thinglike objective presence of the "world" objectively present. This being [Sein] is existentially incomparable to the former existence of a thing. The former existence could never be grasped in an ontologically adequate way. What was necessary was an ontological clarification of the meaning of being of this being, and this means that the existential definition of the world was initially, and in fact exclusively, oriented toward the being of this being. But we cannot reduce this being to an objectively present thing. The latter must first be understood. But if we go back to the very beginning of the existential analytic of Dasein we find that being, as the meaning of being, has been interpreted primordially and exclusively in terms of the existential meaning of being-in-the-world. Thus, our existential interpretation of being must proceed in the same direction as our ontological interpretation of the being of Dasein.

## § 79. The Structure of the Allegory in Terms of the Analytic of Dasein

The analysis of the things at hand in the surrounding world is not a mere process of measurement and measurement. We have to develop an adequate concept of the things at hand in the surrounding world and develop the phenomena corresponding to this. A preliminary sketch of what we are trying to do can help. We say that for each fact, there is a space [Zufalle] in which it is obtainable and a corresponding "time." These two terms have the same meaning as the third one: the space of what is objectively present "at a time." The spatiality of what is objectively present is precisely determined by the temporality of Dasein. The temporality of Dasein is not at all like a later ontology of the "subject," or a more traditional geography of the "geographical." The spatiality of what is objectively present cannot be explained in terms of the latter. At the same time, the ontological concept of the spatiality of Dasein does not characterize a peculiar kind of being of Dasein, but rather the kind of being of the being-in-the-world, which is to be disclosed in the analysis of Dasein.

We said that for each fact there is a space in which it is obtainable and a corresponding "time." However, this sign indicates only the "there" in the sense of the there after it has already been discovered. We said that for each fact there is a space in which it is obtainable and a corresponding "time." We understand the expression "space of what is objectively present" in the sense of the there in such a way that these two terms have the same meaning. What is at hand in the surrounding world in such a way that it can be objectively present is what is nearest to us. This there is "close to us," that is, it is in our spatial relations of "being-in-the-world." We say that for each fact there is a space in which it is obtainable. We do not talk about the "spatial center" of a thing at hand, but we speak of the space "near to us."

But the "spatial center" of what is "near to us" is grounded in the temporality of Dasein. It is not a fact of the world that what is at hand is exactly "at hand." The world is not a factical "object." But the world is nevertheless a context of what is at hand.

But the world is not only what is objectively present in a particular world, there is also that "near to us" which is "near by" but not objectively present. The "near by" of what is "at hand" is not a fact of the world, but is grounded in the temporality of Dasein. The "near by" of what is at hand is only realized when the totality of what is at hand is taken into account. In this way, the "nearby" of what is objectively present is also ontologically possible. Only when the there is understood in terms of the "nearby" of what is objectively present can there be a possibility of ontically determining the world with regard to its "general situation" and of its "utility."

But the "general situation" does not mean that what is objectively present is immediately at hand or at hand. The "general situation" is grounded in the horizon of anticipatory resoluteness. We understand the horizon of such a resolute existentiell taking over the possibility of existence, whether in the mode of waiting for something or of taking over the possibility of taking over the situation. What is at hand in the surrounding world is ontically already at hand. As such, it has already been circumspectly discovered, and we have to use it within certain limits. The existence of what is at hand is not a reality which has to be imposed on it from without.

The horizon of anticipatory resoluteness has the meaning of the horizon of a being whose kind of being is existentially the way it is, and whose being is concerned in its being about the being of what it is, and concerning itself with being-in-the-world. The horizon of anticipatory resoluteness is the future. The horizon of a being whose kind of being is existentially such that it wants to be able to be more "global" in its possibilities of being is the "world space" of the there. The world is not a factical objectively present thing. We use the expression "world" in an indefinite sense. The "distinction" between the two realms of the world belongs to the horizon of the horizon of anticipatory resoluteness.

The world is, so to speak, already "given" to Dasein.

## § 80. The Symbolic and Interpretive Character of the Meaning of Being in the Primitive and Inauthentic Culture of Peru-An Exposition of the Problem of Extraterrestrial Being [Sein] in the Land of the Titans [Ütingen]

We have the task of returning to the primordial meaning of being of beings. This means that we also need to make manifest the way in which Dasein, lost in the they and itsworld, understands the being of beings and the way in which it is. The primordial meaning of being is a primordial and definitive revelation of Dasein. Everything that is and is understood in terms of being is also primordial. But we also understand the people and culture of the neighboring countries in the same way. In this way we also grasp the significance of their language, literature, and art. In all this we learn to be impressed by the great antiquity of the world and to value its great antiquity. The world and its history never cease to shock us.

But the world is also, at the same time, a great antiquity. When we see the world in the way of the Greeks we then also, of course, feel the influence of the earthy and terrestrial in a higher degree. But the influence of the earthy and terrestrial is still concealed to us by the subtle and "worldly" "natural sciences." The loss of the ancient world is such that we should always first penetrate into "the natural world." But at the same time we should never forget that in ancient times, on the basis of the situation of affairs in each case, every age, a different way of existing was required. The task of a reestablishing the world's ancient world is not to bring about a "transcendental" transformation of the world and the realm of beings.

With the intention of returning to the "primordial" meaning of being, we must now set forth the question of the meaning of beings. The meaning of being was originally understood in terms of the signification of the verbal substantive. These verbal substantive relations were all based upon the presently reigning ontological framework of that framework. But the ontological characterization of the meaning of being had its limits. We are not able to go any further, even if the question of the meaning of being is asked constructively and with a view to the possibility of such a question, without illustrating anew the necessity of a retrieval of the pre-ontological framework that is presupposed in order to enable us to ask the question of being.
